Do I sit in wallow in my own self pity, depressed because I gave into a moment of weakness? Or do I forget it and move on?
Personally I have passwords for about 50 different online ‘things’ at home, and close to 100 at work, and yes, I re-use some passwords, and I write some down. I’m aware that there are online sites where you can store all your passwords and remember just the one that takes you to that site, but I’m wary of privacy there too. I’ve resisted online banking, especially since I heard an address from the Privacy Commission pointing out how vulnerable that can be. I’m not sure what I’ll do when cheques are phased out in a couple of years. Perhaps by then we’ll be able to scan thumbprints or retinas for our online transactions? Or maybe we’ll all have ‘chips’ implanted. Was life easier before the internet appeared?
Rolled up and ready to scoff. I should say we had them for both main and pudding courses. For pudding we added Nutella and chopped banana, and (not to the same ones) lemon and sugar but I forgot to take shots of those ones.
Top 1 – Ralph Datu
2 1/2 cups plus 2 tablespoons sugar
Right now I am sitting in my psychology class, reading about social psychology – the study of why people act the way they do in different situations. I just finished reading the section on conformity.
Love coming your way, Zoie & Fern
i won’t tell how we ended up with each other, ’cause it’s just too cheesy, or what challenges that we have faced and currently facing ’cause I may cry. lol.
This may have been one of those projects that could have been accomplished on one of the self publishing sites but we're particular about every aspect of book making and it's also a good opportunity to show off some skills as well as the art. So the idea for a small catalog that touched upon all the past two years work was born. Initially we needed to layout how big this project was and what we wanted to include, so a few trials with printer paper mock ups led us to settle on a 36 page book that contains 3 hand stitched sections.
“Wouldn’t it be wonderful if everybody could look inside their own bodies like that?” asks Smarr, director of the California Institute for Telecommunication and Information Technology (Calit2) in La Jolla, near San Diego. Smarr is a proponent of a new kind of medical science driven by data, known as “self-quantification,” which he sees as the key to a revolution in healthcare and the path to a healthier, more self-determined life. “It is absurd that we collect data about everything but our health,” Smarr argues. “For thousands of years, the question you are asked by your doctor has been, ‘how do you feel?’ It is being replaced by, ‘what are your data trends?’”
If you look deeply into the palm of your hand, you will see your parents and all generations of your ancestors. All of them are alive in this moment. Each is present in your body. You are the continuation of each of these people. ~ unknown
Kids off to school, and I am full of energy, which is not like me AT ALL.
7. Personal income taxes will increase.
You are a lit cigarette
Would the SPL or SFA object? They might find this to be a convenient solution to a thorny problem.
with calluses
4. Links. Although my plan is to solely blog about adoption-related issues, I may take liberty and post a link just because I like it. It’s my blog, and I’ll link if I want to. (I can be a little cheesy – you’ve been warned.)
1/2 cup Panko (or your own ground bread crumbs, or leftover quinoa, rice, or risotto)
Today was my very first Mother’s Day. It was pretty special. I must say though, I was still focused on me and Justin’s Mothers and it didn’t really hit me that I was someone’s mother. Carter (aka Justin) got me a new running GPS watch as a gift along with a really sweet card :) I had to wake Carter up at 8am (seriously these days he sleeps at least 12 hours every night and I can’t remember the last time I didn’t have to wake him up in the morning) and feed him. He was only awake for right at an hour before we put him down for nap number 1. His first nap is usually 2-2 1/2 hours, but we had to cut it short because we had to get to church. We woke him up a little before 10:30am and changed his clothes and put him straight in the car and drove to church. We went into the contemporary service and fed him. As soon as he was done eating, I took him to the nursery (a first and one of the things on my 101 list that I blogged about here).
The modern philosophical tradition, as Brandom characterises it, tends to explain apparently material inferences in terms of formal inferences, by suggesting that apparently material inferences rely on suppressed premises that, if made explicit, render the relevant inference context-independent. So, to use one of Brandom’s favourite examples, if I make the inference “It is raining, so it is wet outside”, a formalist would regard me as possessing a hidden premise here – “If it is raining, then it is wet outside” – and the inferential chain here runs “If it is raining, then it is wet outside; it is raining; therefore it is wet outside”. The actual inference them becomes a purely formal logical one – If X then Y; X; therefore Y – and the actual content of the inference is simply plugged in to this formal operation. The inference itself is independent of that content.
Why has dodgy accounting not been acted on when even a previous treasurer has reported it? (6)
Cant Go Home
Soda bread is a lazy or disorganized cook’s very best friend. Done right, it has lovely flavour and texture, is best eaten straight from the oven, and can be brought together within half an hour. It involves no leavening, so one needs not engage in the faff of raising, knocking back and general loafing around while yeasts have sugar-fuelled orgies of not-quite sex. I have for years used the no-nonsense recipe given in Delia Smith’s Cookery Course for sour cream soda bread, adapted to use live yoghurt instead of soured cream because that’s what we generally have a pot of malingering on a fridge shelf. Reaching for it, I realised with horror that this was the one cookbook I left in our old kitchen in Italy, when we returned recently to make Sheffield our main home. What would Jack do? Assess. And recall that thankfully my friend Simon gave me Delia’s recessionary cash-in of a recompilation, Frugal Food, a couple of Christmases ago. Such a book would surely contain a soda bread recipe.
Now, I was slightly distracted during the conversation, but he does have an accent and swallows his R's. Tiger and Thai girl sound completely different when *I* say them... but him... not so much.
On Saturday, the U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton, on her visit to Saudi Arabia, attended the first Strategic Cooperation Forum between the U.S. and the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC). The six countries comprising the GCC are Saudi Arabia, United Arab Emirates, Qatar, Kuwait, Bahrain and Oman.
As both families look forward to the upcoming criminal trial (and their own civil case), the local community especially the Lao have to be aware of what this case means for a community that has seen more than its fair share of daily injustices, racial discrimination, and disenfranchisement from basic resources and opportunities. This trial is the perfect example of much needed advocacy for our social justice issues. We have to move beyond a culture of ‘letting things work itself out’. It’s a matter of whether or not we choose to let another injustice go by unless our own community rises up to challenge these systems and institutions that puts us at a disadvantage. Maybe then we’ll be able to surface some of the root causes that have historically entrenched us in these two separate legal systems.
***PINK PICK***
17. Sorry Doesn't Help (Years of Refusal)
“Yeah.”
Yet somehow it feels like it is.
Even the Pookie is at an easier stage. He does still freak out when thwarted, but because he's able to say more and indicate more, it's much easier to get him what he is asking for, instead of him just screaming NO until we guess correctly.
"I am a professional assassin and SMERSH have contracted me to assassinate you and have specifically paid extra for a particularly nasty death which makes it look like you died in a particularly bizarre sex game gone wrong; I had already bought the shire horse stallion (he's called Henry), the lard and the dragon dildo (from Bad Dragon of course, I only use the very best tools) when I found out that you are innocent of the accuse, so I make out this time to contact you. Unfortunately international crime syndicates won't admit to mistakes and cancel the hit so I will be forced to carry out the assassination on you. Sorry about that old chap but rules are rules.
The synopsis for 'The Time Destructor' is,
Yesterday saw some serious baking too, due to an uncontrollable and hormonal urge to eat vast quantities of cake!
Portabello Road papers
In an electric mixer with paddle, combine the eggs and granulated sugar. Beat on medium speed until the mixture is light in color and fluffy, about 2 minutes. Slowly (very slowly) add the oil and vanilla and beat on low speed. Add the flour mixture and beat on low speed until just incorporated. Mix in the sour cream just until no white streaks remain.
3/4 cup water body temperature (more is needed if using whole grain flour)
Holler And Shout follows, and again we have a fine R&B/Rock classic full of organ and horns and featuring a smokin' hot sax solo. Let It Shine features Jo Baker, who takes lead vocal on almost half of the songs on the record, and it's a smoldering, sexy soul ballad done up right. Don't Mind If I Do is some of Bishop's aw-shucks good-time humor. A little goes a long way. Jo Baker returns to burn down Rock Bottom, an R&B rocker from Baker's pen. Last Mile is a slow instrumental featuring Bishop's slide guitar.
deal of pain from major back surgeries, but my son fixed
His Stradivarius.
In the family of God, this is how it should be. Oh the change that we could see in our lives if only…
Do you all throw out routines in the summer or weekends?
The Smartards have taken over the world. The reason we can’t fix any real problems, make real advancements, is because of the Smartards. We don’t have those flying cars I was promised, and that pisses me the hell off.
I am entering my paperweight into the following challenges:-
That's how you spell brown
I've been reading an interesting book about old abandoned colonies and outposts of progress. In it, I came across the curious fact that most scientists in the seventeenth century were of the opinion that precious minerals (such as gold, silver and gems) were likely to be found closer to the surface in the tropics. Why? Because they'd been drawn up by the magnetic influence of the sun. It was, after all, well known that the fertility of the soil near the equator was also due to this quasi-sexual attraction between earth and sky.
In our great state of tax free shopping, you can find pretty much anything that you could want in that stretch between these towns. From well know stores in the Tanger Outlets that stretch down Coastal Highway; like Old Navy, Rockport, Nike, American Eagle, Abercrombie & Fitch, PacSun, etc…, to the specialty retail shops that line the main streets in the towns themselves, like Downtown Cowgirl, Quiet Storm, Lewes Gifts, Kids Ketch, and dozens of others. There literally is something for everyone.
how can anyone hate on this guy, seriously?
But those Christmases were the worst. My dad was bitter that he’d lost his family and my mum’s were all intact. Especially as his family were so much friendlier and down to earth, salt of the earth. He didn’t get on with his mother-in-law who he thought sucked the life out of life with her expectations of her daughters to come running at a moment’s notice and her philosophy of life as ‘hell on earth’.
The River Cottage Preserves Handbook
NO SLOGAN REQUIRED
2 Moebius* , Plank* , Neumeier* - Speed Display 5:14
This is an amazing and captivating paranormal romance. I was riveted the moment I opened the first page. The characters were a little hard to connect with because they both could be so loving one minute and so cold the next. They would have been a little more enjoyable if they had been a little less stubborn to one another. Marlena was really stupid at times wanting her independence to the point that she could easily have died; she should have let her heroine protect her. The storyline was different than anything I have read before, and I found it refreshing. I liked that we learned a little bit about the underground world of demons. It was fascinating. At the same time, I liked that the serial killed had the demon side and the humanity side. It added a complexity that I enjoyed. I liked the ending for the most part but I didn't feel like it fit the Marlena character that we see throughout the novel. I can't go in depth about it without giving away the ending.
Dies: Spellbinders
We saw at least 1/2 dozen gators, and
melting every second in the knowledge light.
If everyone had that attitude, she said, the Republicans wouldn't have a nominee. Exactly, I said. A brokered convention. Many long for it. A colleague out at school said he's still fuming at Paul Ryan for not getting in. All the guys who could have won refused to step up to the plate. Oh, she said, it's not all that bad...
Post-dinner conversation mellowed out somewhat, and turned to still perverse, but lighter topics. My Dad left the room to go watch TV, and the rest of us discussed a sex toy party my step-mother had thrown (I politely begged off the invitation for obvious reasons) where my step-sister had the balls to ask my father if he would buy her a new vibrator. Of course he did, and this prompted a subsequent conversation between my father and I where he felt the need to tell me that he would buy me one too if I needed it, and had the courage to ask.
The following are the words of “Bud” Day:
What should the response be? Here I am hesitant to give ideas, because I am a mathematician, not a security expert. One approach is to figure out why these primes are getting reused. Another is to simply stay away from the key issuers which seem to have this problem most often; the paper reports that this issue is much rarer for some issuers than others. Or one could imagine testing each key against a few million preexisting keys, and regenerating it if a hit comes up.
"This amounts to one murder every two-and-a-half days for five consecutive years. How under such circumstances can the police claim to be ‘shocked’ or surprised at what happened to the British couple?"
24 if while you are undertaking the work you are dismissed can/do you expect a period of notice?
No wonder I remain a hopeless mainliner.
We took a long walk and then JP had to cram 14 hours of work into the 10 hours he had left in the day, so I took Claire to Walmart for the continuation of Easter festivities. I agonized over bath towel colors and accessories and Claire picked up a few pillow pet friends to keep her company in the bath aisle. We said goodbye to them before check-out. We got home just before a big rainstorm hit, so the kids and I watched Puss in Boots while JP toiled away. Then I made prime rib for the first time ever, which introduced my only source of stress for the day. We have purchased steak approximately 10 times in our entire marriage and this was the most expensive piece of anything we'd ever put in our shopping cart. AND we somehow lost our meat thermometer and it was raining too hard to make me want to go out and get one. So I winged it (and stressed over it) and read approximately 1,000 online recipes and reviews (and stressed some more).
There is a feeling that I'm waiting for something. Whether this be an event, a person, a change within myself, I am not sure. What is certain is that the only sensible thing is to ignore that feeling. If one waits for an event, or a person, or a change within oneself before engaging with life, life will trot on anyway.
The Guthrie Opportunity Center, the venue, is a big, open, fluorescent-lit, concrete-floored, concrete block room with high ceilings and zero charm. It looks exactly like the empty industrial space it, in fact, is.
Gazing where the lilies blow
Since he seized power in a 1969 coup, Gadhafi has ruled with an iron hand and the often quixotic ideology laid out in his "Green Book," (a treatise on Islamic socialism) which outlines Gadhafi's anti-democratic and economic policies.
When will I ever learn.
Yes, please. I’ll take three.
And while we are at it, how about we make your life even easier with a "cheat sheet" of all that's new? Head over to the MFT Blog to print out a shopping list.
She is irritatingly clever.
“If he can take good care of me, fine, I’ll stick with him. But if not, I’ll find my own way.”
Richard O’Barry is a world known environmentalist and before turning against dolphin captivity in the 1970’s he was the trainer of the five dolphins that played Flipper in the 1960’s TV series. O’Barry helped capture many dolphins himself during his time as a dolphin trainer, including the dolphins that played Flipper. “Flipper was the best and the worst thing that ever happened to dolphins”, he says. “It exposed the world to dolphins, but it also created these captors and the desire to hug them and kiss them and love them to death” (McNeill). O’Barry says he changed when the Flipper dolphin Cathy died in his arms from “suicide” – by self-induced asphyxiation – because of depression.
But it's the supporting players who make the story...the fellow from Royal Tenenbaums, Naseeruddin Shah who is magical and mystical and Madhur Jaffrey who plays Samir's mother but who also happens to be a well-respected cookbook author.
And the point is that there is real variety – but each one comes to an individual marked with the church’s name on, received from the same God. It is the same Spirit, whatever the gift. It is the same Lord Jesus (cf v3), whatever the service of the individual believer. It is the same God empowering his people, whatever the work may be.
Apparently we had arrived at Jack's up to here.
OK, now, back to the start. A beautiful, although chilly start to my walk, I even considered stepping back inside and putting on something warmer, but I knew with the sunshine, it would warm up quickly enough, and it did.
Prayers immediately followed that call and haven't stopped since. My sister is a beautiful woman and she has been so blessed with an amazing husband and now, baby girl! Tinsley Ellison is a joy and a delight and I am so thankful she is a part of our family! Yesterday, we all joined them in a celebration of God's goodness in dedicating Tinsley to the Lord. No, this was not a baptism, it was a beautiful way for my sister and her husband to share, before family and friends that they were committing to raising her in the ways of the Lord.
And…with Brand Spankin’ New Releases every month, there’s always something worth coming back for!
I'd like to share a card today that would be cute for either a Congrats On Your Engagement or a Wedding card.
With the advent of the ridiculous dumbasses suing McDonalds because the coffee they clumsily spilled was hot (can i get a big well, DUH right here?), the figurine is now packaged separately in most cakes. You know the person that sued Mickey Ds with the coffee spill is a village idiot, but the damn judge and lawyer should be tarred and feathered then shot into the sun on a rocket or, at the very least, sacrificed to a volcano. Back to the subject, King Cakes come in many flavors. I favor...hmmmm....all of them! Blueberry may be the best, but raspberry is also tasty. Wait, the apple rocks too. So does the lemon. And the strawberry. Just try one, you'll like it!
RR—Right. They could vary also. At times they may be more playful, at times they could be more threatening. Now there are some other effects of the lights that are more subtle and are really interesting. One of the things that has been really interesting about my book is that after having written the book, many people in Southeast Texas who have had these experiences have contacted me, and in some cases they had experiences that just freaked them out. I mean, they didn’t just see an interesting little light—no. They had things happen that just really shook their reality map.
Raven Had a Dilettante Streak
Pavement - Crooked Rain Crooked Rain - 2004
I learned a lot from this project. I had always wanted to be more sustainable or “Green” but I never really knew how. I thought the small acts like what I did for my PSP were not enough to make a difference, so why bother? I was wrong though and this project has definitely showed me that. I will keep up my Personal Susatinability Promises and I’ll continue to add little things to it. I know that if I keep doing things over time they will become habit and I will stop forgetting. So all I need to do is stick with it and I can in the end make a big difference in my community and environment. I’m very glad I took this class and I know I got a lot more out of it then just 3 credits.
u-pick strawberries
If you are reading this post right now…please do do check these bloggers mentioned above. They give you poetry, art, inspirational stories, posts that will makes you laugh, creativity, real stories of their daily life and experience and so much more.
I believe she is well.
The Koch Brothers and a couple of friends are drivin’ around
Corduroys, and colored sleeves,
MARYLOU ANDREW: Has 2011 been a good year for the various Engro businesses?
13 Self Help Books
My amazingly beautiful cousin Nancy was rushed to the hospital with appendicitis, had the routine surgery...a week later after numerous surgeries and such due to complications she is gone...this has hit us hard, she was 26 years old, so beautiful, so full of life. Nancy was one of those people that could light up a room when she entered, who became instant friends with nearly anyone, she was silly, funny and as close to an angel on earth as a person can get. 5 months ago she married the man of her dreams, I have never seen her so happy, she shinned, he loved her so much...it was the perfect wedding, and now shes gone. We were very close, when she was little I was her babysitter, and as she got older we became best friends, and she adored Ashley...she loved to antagonize the hell out of Ash, and Ashley gave as good as she got, they laughed all the time, Nancy was so proud of Ashley, she was setting up her vacation in order to be at Ashley's graduation...we aren't handling this well at all. I love her, and I keep expecting the phone to ring and have it be her using one of her fake voices to trip me up...then listen to her laugh cause she got me...I keep expecting my near daily emails to keep smiling...this world was a better place with her in it. I don't know how to live in a world thats shes not a part of. Its so hard because no one knows what the hell went wrong, the drs kinda shrug and say they don't know, hopefully more will be known after the autopsy...why did an incredibly healthy, vibrant 26 year old die from such a simple surgery...why did so many small mistakes get made...I am so so so angry and I don't know who to point that anger at. I have no one to talk to about it, my mom just cries, Ashley is having a hard enough time, and Ken doesn't seem to understand...I am lost, and I feel so empty, I cry constantly, I close my eyes and see her...I just want to know why she was taken from us. I am not religious, and I feel as if what little i believed in is gone, because I feel like a good god would never do this, would never destroy so many lives, would never take such a special person from us when there are so many pieces of shit out there...I am angry, sad, confused...worn out, mind body and soul.
I was at a fun scrapbooking retreat a few weeks ago, and decided to take a break from making pages, and try something new. Do you ever have one of those ideas in your head, and sometimes they turn out and sometimes they don't? Fortunately, this one turned out just like the idea in my head, and I was so pleased! I used a combination of ideas from Jennifer McGuire and Tim Holtz to make these tags and flowers, and love them.
Pete couldn't sleep for a whole week.
I did secretly hold out hopes that my latest entry might attract the judges eye so that I might make the short list - that I would have been pleased with. But no - my entry has not appeared so I can recycle that story into another competition when the time is right.
Hope you all had a wonderful one! Enjoy the start of the week!
Advisor: Yes, and terrorism, rape and sexual assault of minors.
I am unable to see any Images.. They all have a White Squares.. I am also unable to see any headers or profile pictures..
When I was little I hated the idea of taking more than one shower a day. Now, I would take up to five if only I didn’t have to do my hair and re-apply makeup every time I take a shower.
After that they buried the dead, and got Gunnlaug on to his horse thereafter, and brought him right down to Lifangr. There he lay three nights, and got all his rights of a priest, and died thereafter, and was buried at the church there.
- Grate bar of soap and add to saucepan with water. Stir continually over medium-low heat until soap dissolves and is melted.
Kyle Alisharan as Alex Pineda who appeared as Baggage Handler in Snakes on A Plane
Paul was very excited and trained every day before the big event.
Does the prefix of “back home” slip in just before you tell a slightly monotonous story about something that happened years ago with your home friends which concludes with you laughing alone saying, “You had to be there.”? Better start being more selective with those “This one time, at band camp” stories to minimize the chances of boring your new found friends to death.
I hunkered down and pumped my arms and just went for it. I slowed my pace down just as I had practiced over all those bridge runs, and before I knew it, I was already at the top.
Stella, she is a cook in a restaurant. She met a man, Tony, he is her neighbour. Stella didn’t have a interest for him at first, the time has gone, they become good friend.
Q: Many of us who write mysteries want to see justice prevail. In your books, right does not always win out, or at least enjoy a happy ending. In some ways, you seem to be following in the footsteps of Patricia Highsmith with THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY because your characters do commit murder, and yet we cheer for them. Comment on that.
Compression mode: Lossy
No, it is disturbing because authoritarian states, and states that are becoming authoritarian, have a long history of using forced nudity and sexual humiliation to quell resistance and dissent, to engender fear and submission on the part of the populace. I frequently disagree with Naomi Wolfe, but she gets this point dead right.
The story of your life
Well, that “one-man” who started it all is Benji Chu. He had a vision of how he wanted to lend a hand to those who needed one, but more importantly, to who were ready to reach out and take that hand. The motivation came from deep inside and is based on Benji’s own perspective that:
Free spirit
It's an alcoholic soft drink.
facts about the declining levels of
Week 4/7 - 4/11
more and more
WASHINGTON, Feb. 3, 2010 - "Over these last two months, the Chiefs and I
I stand over my desk, ready to make a move
-You must leave verification information for your entries. Incomplete entries will be disqualified.
3.The recipe /ingredient should be an iron rich source since the theme "Iron Rich Foods".You can pick the ingredients from the above listed list or any others too.Put on your innovative caps and come out with lovely ideas.Two archived entries are allowed.
“I love you too.” Sniffling, Addison looked at Christian as he pushed back some of the curls that fell in her face.
The techs would not tell me anything, so we have to wait 3-4 days for the report from the doctor. I'll call on Monday to check on things, because I'm very curious about how it looked on their end. I know from watching the one monitor in the room that her ETCO2 stayed in the 45-49 range for the most part and I saw her RR drop below 10 a few times. Of course, I didn't watch the monitor all night...I did attempt to catch some Zzz's, though they proved to be quite elusive. KayTar and I spent the day here recuperating and I am SO looking forward to a good night's sleep in my own amazingly comfy bed tonight.
“Live a Little. Do Something daring and a little risky every day. Even if you don not become rich, this habit will keep your life exciting and keep you younger for years longer.”
I've been working on a little project. I've dragged in some friends, got a fabulous team together, and hatched a scheme. To help.
Autism is at one end of the continuum and is the most severe type of ASD. Children with autism have unusual behaviors that are repetitive and stereotypical, as well as very restricted interests and activities. They have severely disordered verbal and nonverbal language and as many as half never develop any type of language. Autism is also characterized by impairments in social interaction that include poor eye-to-eye gaze, lack of social or emotional turn-taking, and a failure to develop relationships with peers. Most children with autism also have delayed intellectual abilities (DSM-IV-TR, 2000).
In the above picture you can see there's also a card you can bring to Holt Renfrew and get a free nail file! Another perk. I don't have a Holt Renfrew here though, sad.
Your mother and I are waiting to take you home. Right now you’re more a dream than a reality, but still you’re there— we’ve named you- we’ve imagined you— we’ve already put you into our lives and you’re here except— no one knows this more than we do—you’re not here.
loyalty to you
SIZE: X LARGE
Thankfully at the last minute Retard moved as close into the side of the road as he could and I managed to pass without incident. On passing I had a look in my rear view mirror to see Retard move straight back out into the middle of the road but this time he moved all the way over to the other side of the road into the path of a car coming the other way. All I can think is that he was playing chicken with whatever cars came his way.
McQuade apparently thinks this sounds like fun because he grins. I think it sounds awful. (What if she’s a farter? Do you really want to die with your mouth clamped onto someone’s ass cheeks?) Lola and McQuade end up spending time together, but when McQuade comes home to find Lola cleaning up his sh*thole house, and then discovers she threw away his beer and replaced it with vegetables, McQuade flips his lid. “You’re killing yourself!” she wails after he tells her, “If I wanted my house clean, I’d get a maid!”
That what we are dealing with is organised banditry is underscored by the fact that virtually every organ of government that has anything to do with fuel importation was indicted – including external auditors. It would have been impossible to carry out this horrendous haemorrhage on our treasury if it was not sanctioned from the highest levels. Note the following:
Solar Power ($50 and up avg. $199):
They spout statements that sound like sound bites but they can't discuss it further. If you try to explore it more deeply to reveal the flaw in the statement they disengage and never get to the eye-opening "ah ha" moment.
But alas! They emerged from this second circling mass, and once again came together in perfect formation, unscathed! I silenty cheered to them and the Universe. :D But an even more amazing thing? The random, chaotic mass of gulls they left behind? They started to follow the 5, one by one, and in groups.
The Orange outline is the outer boundaries of our AO. At no point can any location along that boundary either observe or fire upon our point defenses.
2010.08.29 Chechnya Tsentoroi 7 5 A wave of armed Islamists attack a village, killing at least seven.
Facts I didn't know
*Gardening (my mama and I love plants!)
Finding Violet Park by Jenny Valentine
Your many sins are all forgiv’n,
“I suppose you’re right.” Derrek looked up at the sun deepening his frown. It felt like it was following him, more so than the one back home. It looked like it was going to just open up and pour fire down on the two of them.
Then I came to the present moment and thought all those experiences in your life challenging or not were there because later in life you may go through something way harder or just hard and feel like its never going to end and that’s when you can look back and think about the times when you did make it through, you were strong, you were determined and you made it! So you CAN make it through this rough spot! Life has so many unanswered questions and so many different roads you can take think if you don’t trust yourself enough to lead you right, who are you going to trust?
OH, GOOD PEOPLE. This is, simply, the most delicious thing I've had in a long, long time.
The ring or wheel of the Advent wreath of evergreens decorated with candles was a symbol in northern Europe long before the arrival of Christianity. The circle symbolized the eternal cycle of the seasons while the evergreens and lighted candles signified the persistence of life in the midst of winter. Some sources suggest the wreath—now reinterpreted as a Christian symbol—was in common use in the Middle Ages, others that it was established in Germany as a Christian custom only in the 16th century.
"Run Moon.....Run!"
I was struck by this image of a diminished author as a brave wanderer: off to climb a taboo mountain in this brand new world - but things change as the video progresses, and the ending, for me, was something I didn't quite expect.
I've been busy putting together the programme for Louth county, on behalf of the Louth Arts Services (and Poetry Ireland, too) since the mid-summer and it's a real cracker this year.
More clients may be asking about whole life as a product option for meeting their financial needs. But some producers may have found themselves stuck in the “single solution” rut. That solution was usually low cost no-lapse universal life insurance (UL). Often, producers would adjust the length of coverage to the life expectancy based on client input rather than looking at other benefits that could be offered by life insurance in addition to the death benefit. The problem is that no-lapse universal life, while very flexible in the wealth transfer planning stage, has little or no cash value available for meeting other financial needs if issues arise.
The fifth song, 'The Good Ol' Jay Turser, Back in Action,' sounds like Future Days-era Can, which I've really not heard a lot of people steal from very often. Some other sounds I can hear in various parts of the album are Pavement and Sonic Youth-isms, but there is too much originality throughout (jazz breaks, unexpected vocal harmonies, drum solos, boogie piano, beatboxing, wildly optimistic-sounding guitar melodies, etc.) to dismiss this as derivative or something. I dunno, hearing this will give you a better idea than I can provide in words. Best heard in sequence, all in one go.
And so it is today, If you don't think the government want's to or is controlling us I need some of the dope you are smoking. They crave power and money and are well on the way to having it all.
The ground belongs!
I have two sisters... I was just praying for three to live!
"Sparks" by Coldplay - From their classic album Parachutes. This CD was all the rage in college. Who knew this "cool new band" would later take over the airways U2 style.
At least 2/3 could have been written in another language, full of history & esoteric literary references. Let me say it first, I’m not a deep thinker. I glance. I peruse. I skip to the last chapter.
All of these items also brought more patterns into the room, made it more of a collage, made it cozier, made it more me.
You may have noticed, even if you were trying not to pay attention to it, the hubub around a couple of trilogies, mainly The Hunger Games and Fifty Shades of Grey.
Should I breathe?
Ultimately what we’re left with is the next chapter in the gallant Bassnectar series. As his crowds have grown from bars and clubs to huge venues and arenas, his music has advanced immensely as well. Just like the Beatles, Bassnectar’s albums are not all a precise representation of exactly what he is, but that is what makes him, and the Beatles, fantastic. He is constantly reinventing himself, pushing limitations and creating fresh sounds. Along with a great attitude and incredible live performance, Bassnectar has once again proven why he is a robot lion in this EDM kingdom.
I hope you will consider representation for this alternate history novel. The Time Travel Journals: Thomas Andrews of Dunallon is complete at 150,000 words. This is my first novel.
Before the guests arrived, I had all the serving tables ready for their (and the cookies') arrival. To keep all the cookies organized, I set up two card tables, covered them in tablecloths, and set out all my white serving pieces (borrowing a couple from my Mom). I highly recommend slowly collecting white serving ware. I think it is so versatile...it's my favorite way to serve a beautiful meal! It allows all the beautiful colors and textures of the food to stand out and speak for themselves! But since these would be filled with packaged cookies, it just made for a nice backdrop for each guest to place their cookies and recipes. For colors, I chose to decorate using reds and whites with touches of silver here or there (pretty much my holiday colors this year...not the most sophisticated...but definitely merry and bright). And last, but not least, all wrapped up and ready to go were my Butterfinger Wannabes...the first cookies to hit the table!
about 10 oz of melting chocolate candy wafers. I used the dark chocolate flavored ‘Make and Mold’ brand
You’d see the “company table cloths”,
* 1/4 teaspoon Himalayan salt, or 1/2 tsp. sea salt
Look at this article in the Sowetan. A black couple bonked in the grass next to their car and the disgusting pervert black cops watched them and filmed them...and then extorted money from them threatening to sell the video. Sex video cops might be removed from service
Set your sewing machine for the widest, longest stitch (a basting stitch)
Mudcake and ice cream for dessert.
I don’t know where the path will lead
All this above goes to show that in making her case for marriage between the Catholic Church and Occupy Portland it’s what Chapman hasn’t said within her piece that is more important than what little has been said. It’s not enough for us to fall for resort to authority arguments or follow empty propaganda-laden cheerleader phrases such as, “something new is happening” so that we might lend support. That’s not logical. “Something new” is happening all the time in the world, but that doesn’t necessary make everything happening in the world virtuous. Does it? Especially, when it comes to crowds of malcontent people taking it to the streets.
You may now kiss the bride…
We were singing "Angel Dust”,
Hello Sandwiches!
The internet at home hasn’t been working. It works sometimes, mainly during the day when I’m not there. So this has kept me from posting anything. I know I could be writing something and save it for when the internet is up and working, but I’m lazy.
Quite often I find myself watching or reading a news article and asking myself “what if?” What if I put my characters through this or that? What if this happened to them? What would happen next? How would they react or overcome this problem? Where would it take my storyline? Best of all, how would it create tension or drama in my story?
And when i say “sooo pour”, i mean that the average family is freaking struggling. 1/7 kids, go to high school, can afford instruction and medicines, etc.
Children will find this book hilarious and enjoy moving along to the story, and this book is perfect for story times. Even my 11 month old was engaged in this read, and giggled as I wiggled and read for her.
A Little Common Place Book - $15.00
John McTiernan (Die Hard)
I see certain things coming together in my life. I’m appreciative of the real friendships and I’m appreciative of the understanding that comes with letting folks go.
What would I love? I’d like a tailored paper that gives me some of what I need to know or may be interested in (plurality) alongside what I’m almost guaranteed to read. And I want it updated in real time. I want my news to react to what I’m reading by choosing other things I might like, but also gives me a broad information-rich experience using text, pictures, video and source documents. (Too much of the online content I read is not what I’m really interested in. At the moment, for an immersive high-quality experience of analytical information I go to specialist websites or to the paper or magazines.)
No country disregards its champions more than Pakistan and even then, somehow, they just keep producing more and more of them in each generation. Saqlain was a trendsetter, the pioneer of that H-bomb called the ‘doosra’. In his peak, Saqlain rivalled the likes of Warne and Muralitharan for the title of the best spinner in the world. Even though his career was peppered with controversies and injuries, he still managed to cement his place as the best spinner ever from his country. In Tests, he was a master, but in ODIs he was nothing short of a wizard. He raced away to 100 ODI wickets faster than anyone else in the game. Sadly though, apathy from his home association meant that his last international appearance came at the age of just 27.
Early in Bernard Ramm’s writings, he shared the evangelical suspicion, but in his After Fundamentalism publication, he embraced Barth’s doctrine of scripture. Ramm, realizing the Modernist-Fundamentalist debates left evangelicalism without an engaging and winsome response to modernity, adopted a “Barthian” theology of the Word as a model for theological engagement with modernity’s “crisis of representation.”
When he's not re-watching The Human Centipede or scrapbooking The Human Centipede, Martin is in the process of building his own human centipede; kidnapping people and locking them up in his rented warehouse. The sequel is actually set in England, which is maybe why I found it a lot funnier than I should have. My favourite scene comes where one victim realises what Martin has planned. "It's a film!" He yells, "he's gonna stitch us up arse to mouth!" Cue gagged screams from the rest of Martin's captives. The word 'arse' should never be used seriously in a serious movie. 'Arse' may be a very British word, but it is not one that us British use on serious occasions. (True story, if you watch an American movie with English subtitles, a lot of Region 2 releases tend to swap the word 'ass' for 'arse' as if us Brits are going to assume you mean donkey). "He's gonna stitch us up arse to mouth!" Even if I had been one of those fellow victims, I still would have laughed. Arse. There's another occasion where a character says "stop those tears. You're just making daddy's willy harder." Even more so than arse, no English person has ever used the word 'willy' whilst trying to be menacing. Well done on doing your research, Human Centipede 2, but it's all about context.
I hope you're ready for a little Friday fun that is once again inspired by our fabulous sponsor!
April 9th: Pray for Adhithiya. This young man is in second grade. Final exams are this month, pray for him that he will do well! Pray also that he can be a light in this CCH and that the ten gentlemen living here will bring glory to God!
The main attraction is ‘The Shambles’, which is a street that dates back to the Tudor era. What makes this street unique is the lack of distance between the houses, some so close you could climb across.
Yesterday, we went on An Adventure.
Last month I made a few Rice-Filled Heating Pads for some special adults in my life. I thought about those and then decided to make a "child's version" for our grandchildren for Valentine's Day. As a result, this here flock was created...
I’m sorry to be a tease but I *have* to go to bed. I promise you’ll have the third and final chapter of the “Red Car Boy” story before the end of the week. I also need to update you on my potential dates! I’ve got one booked in for this Thursday night (come on down, date number five!) with the “ocker” guy that I’ve mentioned previously. Sparkly eye guy from the same post has also been calling and messaging and I’m kinda into the idea of him… I was also able to stalk his facebook and found that he takes *amazing* photos, which kinda sorta makes me a bit swoony…
Matter = Mother = Female energy = Shakti = Omnipresence.
This year the oldest baby boomers will turn 65. If you call a baby boomer “elderly”, you might find that is not a term they take lightly. The days of older generations taking it easy and moving to quiet communities have faded. This is a very proud group that wants to remain vital and active for as long as possible.
1. A fancy restaurant won’t automatically make a date special.
This is why I would choose Will.I.Am. We can count out Jessie J straight away as she simply winds me up, please see my previous article “Read Between the Lines”, and Danny from the script just follows Will’s decisions; I know he says he doesn’t but if I bumped into someone the amount of times his chair has turned round seconds after Will’s it wouldn’t be a coincidence it would be a court matter. Will.I.Am is the mastermind behind Cheryl Cole and countless other artists, he is a fashion icon and designs cars and phones, he is even starting his own company called IAMAUTO. This man is building a legacy and retirement fund that could potentially means he could stop making music now and still be raking in more money a year than you will in your life time. Let us not forget his ability to take even the most simplistic and take their mediocre delivery to new highs by simple putting them over an amazing beat. Jessie and Tom may be able to voice coach you to the point that you make girls clothes fall off with a simple vibrato but Will can show you how to move your whole family out the ghetto; please note in lack of a family in the ghetto simply buy stupidly expensive cars and houses then insert 14” monitors into every available space.
We had fun in this class because that was the intent of the class. And yet people grew into new areas too. So did I. Having the intent to feel good in the Now, and go with the feeling of that into the future does produce desired growth. There is the intention of discovering your feeling place of feeling good. There is no goal to press forward into, to stress about, to “make happen”.
Luckily the hospital we took her to happened to be the hospital where she had previously spent a fair amount of time. The hospital was even able to give us her medicare number and an insight into her medical background, something the department was unable to provide. That was our first stint there and the poor little thing was in an isolation room for 9 days. She was so patient. Everyone said she was just like a little Koala, all she wanted was cuddles from her new foster dad, and would call for him endlessly if he was not around. It was so good to hear the words from her pediatrician that it “was good to finally see her looking so well and loved”. Ironic.
On the street, he remarks "I can't get along any better now than I did before. I've become a monster now. When my vengeance is over, when I've had my revenge, can I ever return to being the old Dae Su?" He collapses in a crosswalk and a passer by puts him into a cab with instructions to get him taken care of. Dae Su, thanks the man, who smiles and shows his face, saying "Not at all! Farewell Dae Su!" Dae Su realizes this is the man who had him imprisoned, but he's too weak to follow. Once treated and bandaged, he returns to Mi-do. We see that someone is taking pictures of Dae Su from across the street. He starts listening to the tapes he took from the manager at the captivity building. He hears them discuss him, but the only reason the man gives for imprisoning him is that "he talks too much." He decides to visit his friend Joo-Hwan at the internet cafe. He's thrilled to see him. Joo-Hwan listens to the tapes and when Dae Su asks if he knows the voice he answers "Now how the hell should I know, all the names of all the husbands whose wives you screwed." Dae Su logs into his chat account finding a suspicious chat friend with "evergreen" in it, which he questions Mi-do about after tying her up.
“Oh?” she asked, arching her eyebrows.
The destitute Boers of following the Anglo-Boer War became what was termed the proto urban poor.
I worry constantly that if my trilogy, which I've devoted so much of my soul to, ever sells, it will be the only viable work I'll ever produce. Suppose at some point I have to come to terms with the concept "my greatest success is behind me."
* With fruit – apples, pears, bananas are some of my favorites
- 1 tomato, seeded and chopped
When I think of times I’ve hung back and not pursued opportunities, I know the reason: fear. Once, a large city church asked me to come on staff. I wanted to. My mind was full of ideas for the position. What stopped me? I feared leaving the comfort of my denomination. I doubted my abilities even though I had years of ministry experience. I should have jumped in with both feet and figured out how to swim later but I wanted future plans laid out for me now. Fear paralyzed me and, to my regret, I turned down a good opportunity.
If this population has one champion it is the Mayor of the city, Bertrand Delanoë. In my first full decade in Paris I have seen two Presidential elections and two city elections. The former are obviously more important for the country as a whole, but from an individual perspective, the latter have greater meaning, and this for one key reason – I am allowed to vote. As a foreigner, I have no role to play in Presidential elections, but as a European citizen I have been able to vote in city elections. This has left me with the curious sensation of feeling more part of Paris than of France as a whole.
papermania papers
Once the Mullah’s were completely installed, they took American’s hostages, they forced women back into the stone age, and well, the rest as they say is history. They are still a thorn in the side of everything decent, however, at the very least, their people, the Persian People understand that they are ruled by crazy people and have attempted a revolution. It was Carter who’s “give peace a chance” foreign policy lost Iran to the religious right, and the Iranian people were plunged into the Stone Age.
Neil Innes: How Sweet To Be An Idiot
Date: 12.3.2010
It’s not like Acer has really skimped on the specs under the hood either. There’s an Nvidia Tegra 2 dual-core processor, 802.11n Wi-Fi, Bluetooth, built-in GPS support, 1280 x 800 screen resolution and support for the Google Play app store.
This is not the only fall beer released by Brooklyn Brewery as Post Road Pumpkin Ale is also released during this season. I didn’t want to overdose on pumpkin so I decided to stick with only the two that I had. This beer had a small white head that dissipated quickly. It pours a very pretty reddish brown. The aroma was faintly malty and hop-like but pretty basic. There wasn’t a ton of flavor and I found this beer to be a bit too simple. There was a slight lingering hop taste but nothing too special.
Regular D&D tends to assume that high level characters become rulers, there's a correlation between battlefield prowess and domain rulership. History is littered with guys like William the Conqueror, Alexander the Great, Charlemagne, Julius Caesar, and so on, that had great personal power which translated into careers of conquest and political power. That paradigm, which works so well for D&D games at tech levels of the Medieval period, Dark Ages, or Antiquity, seems to break down in the post-Renaissance world. I'm sure one of the talented students of history out there could explain what changed that diminished the political role of the battlefield hero.
Will Mr. or Mrs. Pigeon shake his/her fist at the skies, shouting vulgar words at a god who would one day pretend that spring wants to take hold while unleashing renewed winter fury the next?
Yes. But I'm not sure how far we want to push that boundary.
And while I'm feeling sorry for myself because I'm not in Louisiana for Mardi Gras, and try to find the Mardi Gras Mambo on YouTube to cheer myself up, instead I find something that reminds me in more than one way of how little I truly have to bitch about:
Susanna has deftly collected hundreds of images, from over 75 designers and put them in this one volume (I can see Volume 2 and so on happening). She divides the images into categories that make sense. The full bleed printing presents even familiar images in the most spectacular way making them feel fresh again.
Club management asked the “farm lady” to stop bringing them. We go to the clubs Easter brunch and egg hunt because we have three little boys who want to see the cool neon alternative chicks. They are amazing. ”Farm Lady” brings bunnies, snakes, iguanas, and other critters, and she used to bring a few colored chicks and ducks.
Marchenoir
In FireFox, Select the "Tools" tab, "Options" then "Privacy". Select the box "Clear History when FireFox closes". This is the easiest way to clear browser history here.
This is how the back of the book describes the story: “Banished to the hinterlands of Wyoming, rebellious Lydia Callahan and her thirteen-year-old son Sam have no choice but to cope. But while Lydia drinks and talks to the moose head on the wall, Sam finds a friend in local girl Maurey Pierce. One of the wildest, raunchiest, most heartfelt coming-of-age novels of the past thirty years, Skipped Parts puts Tim Sandlin in the upper echelon of contemporary comic novelists.”
He died on Wednesday, January 25 at the age of 62, and Luigi was the beloved husband of Mattia and the loving father of Maria Antonella Viaggio-Giovanni, Daniela Viaggio and Nicolo Luigi Viaggio. A Christian mass and burial was held at Our Lady of Hope Church on Monday, January 30 at 9:45am. The pizza shop was closed Monday, and a makeshift memorial can be found at the eatery on Dekalb Avenue near Washington Avenue.
Let us help, as you help us.
New features in Windows 8
■Farmer #1
When The Mist is Gone.
Step 6: Next, type in
Sitting here sorting laundry and watching LAW AND ORDER: CRIMINAL INTENT reruns, I am inundated with TV ads for countless cheapy tech schools that offer various vague degrees in "management" and so on. They invariably feature an almost-middle-aged woman of color who looks triumphant and borderline-weepy as she graduates, all while talking about making life better for her children. They know exactly who is unemployed right now, and they have geared these endless commercials for THE TECH COLLEGE RACKET, specifically to them.
Your associations determine your destination. Who is traveling with you on the road of life? Who gets your time, energy and support? If you want to go and grow to another level, check your passengers. Put good fuel in your tank (body). Check your tires often to avoid blowouts and burnouts. Keep your windshield (vision) clear. Follow your map. Don’t get off your road to success and take the next nearest exit because you feel discouraged, tempted or distracted. The main thing is to KEEP the main thing…THE MAIN THING.“
The tip of the iceberg is that the note was not delivered to the investors. The gravitas of the situation is that the investors were never intended to get the note, the mortgage or any documentation except a check and a distribution report. The game was on.
6) They Reeeeeally like kebabs. I think 9 out of 10 dishes were some form of Kebab.
As public relation representatives, we concentrate on personal client attention. We have a persuasive team of consultants who will create the strategic media needed to get you exposure. Such as interviews, articles, book signings , reviews and many others.
Just a few short years ago, the idea of sledding or playing in the snow with a child that was mine was a dream that caused pain. Lot's and lot's of pain. I knew that I wanted to do this, and really I did dream about how much fun it would be. Bundling up and walking through the snow- but then I would wake myself up and find that my arms were still empty and my heart wasn't much better off than those empty arms. All that changed when we received Taliah! All of the sudden things that were only distant and painful dreams were once again revived! So, last year at the ripe old age of 18 months Talaih and I tried to go sledding. The problem was she wasn't really walking very well- very unsteady on her feet, which is only exasperated by snow! And, we didn't have a sled. But I like to improvise so we jimmy-rigged a laundry basket and I felt brilliant! Until I discovered Taliah couldn't keep her balance in the basket and we kept tipping over into the cold, cold snow. Not our best day. Now, getting on to the wow of my gift! This year Taliah is 2 and she is steady on her feet. She loves the snow and has great boots for traipsing around in the snow. With not much so so far in the season, and then the fact that it was so frigid when we finally did get a significant amount of snow we held off from sledding until Friday. I also procured a honest to goodness real sled this summer at a garage sale for the big investment of 50 cents!
Personally I’d much prefer to live in a society where when people make a mistake or do wrong, or when they snap at each other because they get stressed out, they apologize sincerely for it, and try to take actual steps to lessen the likelihood of overheating and snapping or doing wrong again, than one where people hide out behind “deal with it” and never really doubt their own fallibility.
Reduce inflammation, insulin and obesity and you can help reduce many, but not all, cancers. Reduce triggers such as HRT and toxic, counterfeit estrogens and you can further reduce your risk of cancer. Increase your intake of fruits and vegetables – which are full of anti-inflammatory phytoestrogens – to help improve your health. Good health also increases the resources you have to offer to your family, your community and your many life purposes.
We have received widespread information about corrupted practices from insiders, who are clearly sickened by the greedy YBs, who have been cheating their constituents for decades.
The program was promoted as a “BUYcott Israel” event, and the sold out audience was encouraged to join the anti-boycott movement and strike back at the forces behind BDS, the Boycott, Divestment, and Sanctions movement that has been gaining traction worldwide. The Pacific Northwest has become a lightning rod for the BDS movement, where the first successful boycott of a food co-op in America took hold in July at the Olympia Co-op.
Once you commence working with it, you are going to placed the powers of manifestation into overdrive. Everybody have the capability to perform this, you only have to study how you can use it. But that is not all, you are going to also develop into much more productive from currently being far more organized and possessing maximum focus. In stead of operating more challenging, you can get the job done smarter, reaching a lot more in much less time. And you also will likely be capable of minimize stress and limit the hrs you sleep, acquiring extra time to shell out on your personal lifestyle, as an example using your spouse and children. As you discover how to strengthen your life, you are going to also find out how to improve your self-esteem and self confidence. After you find out the best way to use your sub-aware thoughts, and utilize the facility in the law of attraction, the possibilities are totally UNLIMITED!
Hole # 18, par 4, Blue tees, 332 yards
Also, if you need any cloth diapers, or make any kid or parenting related product, or have an idea for a natural-parenting-related product we should stock or class we should host, send it my way. I need all the help & ideas I can get!
Lavender 2
I firmly believe that surrounding yourself with good people is the best medicine to cure whatever ails you. Well, mentally, at least. For me, there is little funk I cannot shake with a good laugh or a proper night out with friends.
259 days ago, I wrote a rather charmingly naive blog about becoming hooked on my blog stats. You can link over and read it, or I can summarize it below.
Nice effort by Martin Scorsese, I thought, but sorry Martin, you've been pipped to the post by Sheffield documentary maker Eve Wood. Her The Beat Is The Law followed up her earlier Made In Sheffield (which took in The Human League, Artery, ABC, Heaven 17 and Cabaret Voltaire) and looked at the years after the miners' strike, when industry declined and Chakk took advantage of the city's empty spaces (and MCA's generous advance) to kickstart Fon studios, without which there'd have been no Krush, no Funky Worm, no Age of Chance, no Warp Records, no Pulp in the charts (possibly), nada. A great documentary, and a lovely 2-disc set with extended interviews and never-before seen Pulp footage; the story of the how the latter came to be discovered is worth the price of the DVDs alone.
The group had just left the sixth annual anarchist book fair being held at a church off Washington Square Park.
I reached the hospital in 2 minutes. The drive way was surprisingly empty as far as I could see. I parked right in front and got out. As soon as I stood up I felt my consciousness fading away. I crumbled to the floor as I approached the doors. My body felt like a ton of US history books as I inched through the sliding doors. Every last movement whipped me out. I flopped to the floor as my world spun and turned into blackness.
The Mumma In Heels.Xo
There you have it - beginning this weekend, Cookbook Sundays will be taking up residence here at Couscous & Consciousness. This will be a weekly event, and entries will be open for the whole week. Joining in every week is by no means compulsory - just join in whenever you feel like it. There are no complicated rules for joining in. Simply, your post must state the author and the title of the book your recipe has come from, and your post must link back to and mention the current week's Cookbook Sunday post. That's it really. Including the Cookbook Sunday badge is optional, but always appreciated. You may submit as many entries as you like, and you may use the same cookbook as many times as you like.
Emmy Lou finally calved. I tried to get a family portrait of Mom, Dad and the new calf. Come on guys, show a little enthusiasm or something. They were much more interested in their breakfast than in posing.
10. Turn off the electronics. I know you love your gadgets as much as I do, but sometimes it’s the best thing to do. When was the last time that you had a family dinner without the television or your laptop? Sit at the dinner tonight as a family and enjoy the simple art of conversation. Try it at least once this week, promise?
I wonder what they think of us.
So when you think on this story, especially Gen 4:6-7, God speaks that word to each of us daily. Sin wants to overcome us unto death but we must master it! The only way we can do that is by God’s power and grace offered through faith in His Son Jesus. And then immerse yourself daily in His word to learn to discern and choose what is good (Heb 5:11-14). I urge you to take this devotional journey with me through the bible, one chapter at a time so that we may be equipped to resist and overcome sin.
But despite professions of support for growth measures, Chancellor Angela Merkel and Germany are unlikely to change their tune.
We have our last birth class this week.......a blessingway of sorts. It will be lots of fun (if I'm not sick.........and will be majorly bummed if I can't go because of it!)
And this pattern, Ice Crystals, is by Florence Anthony. I seem to vaguely recall that name from somewhere, but I don't know where. How many doilies are named Ice Crystals? Does anyone know?
In exposition: When it was time for the date, she had been waiting at the bar so long, she knew the name of the bartender and the lifestory of all his kids.
As Beckett gets older, he is seeing and tracking more things. One of my favorite moments every day is when he first wakes up or when I walk into his line of focus and say hello. There is this sudden moment of recognition where I picture him saying, "Oh there you are! You're the lady with the kisses and the milk!" As a parent, there is really no better moment. It's a pleasure to know that not only does he recognize my face, but he is happy to see me. He grins, and he knows that I will take care of his needs.
Favorite quote:
Baby Girl I may not be able to see you but I do feel you with me.. My heart aches for you every sec of everyday.. What I would give to just be able to hold you in my arms for even just a min. & tell you how much I love you.. Forever on my mind and Forever in my HEART with all the love I have to give Love Mommy.
GINGRICH: I would say that there are three ways in which religion would affect me.
We have warned you so many times and you have decided to ignore our e-mails we have been instructed to get you arrested immediately, and today if you fail to respond back to us with the payment then, we will close your bank account and jail you and all your properties will be confiscated by the
According to the AP article, reported cases of measles (a disease that was at one time essentially eradicated in the U.S.) in Minnesota have been at zero to one per year for the past decade. This year, fourteen cases have been reported since February.
If I find you been creepin’ ’round my back stairs
This is a free event followed by a talkback discussion with the playwright. General admission; no reservations are required.
West Bank to Nongqongqo;
And now I am dancing in the Netherlands. It is my second time after the Doble Ocho (I don´t count El Corte, because the chained salons are international really), and it basically confirms my earlier impressions. The Dutch are, indeed, very friendly and easy going, and the atmosphere at the milongas is very relaxed. It is so relaxed you could probably stand on your head in a corner and no one would be scandalized – they probably wouldn´t notice, and if they did, would dismiss it as insignificant. That´s something you learn quickly in a city like Amsterdam, and I own it is a quality I like very much. But when it gets to being invited by really good dancers – I don´t know. Maybe it just can´t be expected within a couple of days – all tango communities are have a fairly complex social structure, even those that appear to be quite open and unstructured at first sight, and it always takes some time to find your own place.
Whenever I think of spinach, the image of Popeye immediately appears. Popeye is one of my favourite cartoons when I was young. Who can forget the extraordinary strength that Popeye gained after consuming spinach, although I am not sure about the truth behind it? Hehe... Are you a fan of Popeye when young? Don't be shy to raise your hands. :)
This is one of my favorite flavor combos but the mousse that surrounds the center has 4 different recipes just in the one mousse! It is a caramel mousse surrounding a vanilla sponge cake and the center is a pear mousse that has chunks of poached pear. It is garnished with a cold mirror glaze and dark chocolate rings.
Another thing to consider is the fitting and the comfort your running shoes can give. Mizuno running shoes are best known to provide the perfect fitting for different types of feet. Mizuno shoes are also best in providing comfort when it comes to running shoes and other performance shoes.
3.In a separate bowl, mix together the dry ingredients so that when you add them to the cookie dough they get well incorporated. Add the dry ingredients to the wet ingredients and mix until the dough comes together. Remove the bowl and use a large wooden spoon to stir in the chocolate chips and candy bars.
Chris finished his finals on Thursday so we had ourselves a little day date on Friday to kick-off the end of another year of dental school. Our friends told us about this yummy burger place called "FlipSide" in Hudson. It was just a short drive from the Cleve and well worth it. The town is so quaint and clean and pretty. Felt like we were on the "Gilmore Girls" set or something. It is fun to find these gems along road here in middle-east America. It was a feast for the eyes and the tongue, which of course, is the best kind.
I love this color but then I got an idea what would a holo polish look like with a flakie on top? I had to give it a try so I went ahead and added Nfu Oh #51 and look AWESOME the pictures does not do it justice!
Wildcard - One of the categories can be repeated if I so choose
Needless to say, I feel “Bones” in all my bones – this album was amongst the most anticipated records of the year for me and it has fully come up to this label. Its mood and atmosphere are just remarkable.
Revenge is an uncontrollable monster. Each vengeful act of retaliation brings another. It is a boomerang which cannot be thrown without cost to the thrower.
Exact amounts of what Shannon was owed were not detailed in the lawsuit, because terms of the employment agreement requires him to keep the amounts confidential. The lawsuit said Miami has been making monthly payments to Shannon, but at a rate lower than what was stipulated in the coach's contract.
Mark and I have recently planned a trip to Aruba. We were going to wait until March to leave, but Mark isn't exactly a patient man. He wants what he wants--NOW! Besides, he gets a little antsy in the winter, as this recent post has shown, and this will give us a great break from the cold, dreary monotony of the Chicago winter that keeps us cooped up in the house and bored.
This could be significant, since research entities are given a little more slack when seeking injunctions in a post-eBay world. In CSIRO v. Buffalo Technology, Inc., E.D. Tex. (6:06-CV-324), June 15, 2007, the district court made the following "irreparable harm" determination on CSIRO (a non-practicing entity) when it granted a permanent injunction:
I got you
Whew! She watched me better for the rest of the day, and I stayed closer too, but I had a scary morning.
We had lots of treats for the girls to munch on throughout the night. They loved the little pizza's (bagel bites).
Pathetic that although the Labour party have been handed a humiliating defeat, losing seat after seat after seat to massive swings, they should be able to completely fucking ignore our message and plan to just carry on in Government, deaf to the views of the nation.
I try to periodically record random thoughts and ideas in my nature journal....keeping a record of what activities we have been doing or things we have observed that don't necessarily merit a whole journal page. Lists are an easy nature journal technique and even the most beginning of journalers can do a list.
Anyway, look at those tiny hearts she added! So pretty! And her coloring is beautiful. Thank you for sharing, Maureen!
spires –
Kids love animals. Kids love rattles. So why not combine two of their passions into one fun-filled activity! First, we take your 8 month old and drop them in the ‘Play Pit’ (created with care to provide the babies and the snakes with a more natural environment, and don’t worry we’ve laid down tanbark to soften any falls). Then once the babies have become acclimated to their new surroundings, we take 3 truckloads full of the largest and most venomous Eastern Timber Rattlesnakes, and wheel them into the arena. These snakes have been starved and taunted for at least 2 weeks prior, and our special Snakespecialists have made it their mission to make sure the snakes are ready to rumble!
Therefore the LORD heard this, and was wroth: so a fire was kindled against Jacob, and anger also came up against Israel; Because they believed not in God, and trusted not in his salvation: Though he had commanded the clouds from above, and opened the doors of heaven, And had rained down manna upon them to eat, and had given them of the corn of heaven. Man did eat angels’ food: he sent them meat to the full. He caused an east wind to blow in the heaven: and by his power he brought in the south wind. He rained flesh also upon them as dust, and feathered fowls like as the sand of the sea: And he let it fall in the midst of their camp, round about their habitations. So they did eat, and were well filled: for he gave them their own desire; They were not estranged from their lust. But while their meat was yet in their mouths, The wrath of God came upon them, and slew the fattest of them, and smote down the chosen men of Israel.
“You wanna know why, Tee?”
The most beautiful feeling
The Next Big Thing in art. It opened with
Or when you find out that Community is finally coming back on.
As the photos I have saved on my computer improve, my criteria for judging them becomes more discriminating. I would have been very happy with the last cardinal photo, last year. This year, I want better! Every time I take a picture that is an improvement over what I already have, it raises the bar yet another notch, making it even tougher to do better than that in the future. Getting the next better shot then requires even more time and effort.
the solution to conflict in the world and personally is to show more LOVE.
First, the relevant parts of the premise: an ordinary, sport-mad 14-year-old boy wakes from a coma after meningitis, to discover his world changed. Not only is his leg weak (so he may not be able to run again) but his mind is invaded by synaesthesia (where the senses are mixed) and a sinister creature called Dreeg. Dreeg shows Luke that his synaesthesia offers absolute power – and we all know what absolute power does to people. The mechanism of this is that his synaesthetic way of seeing the world gives him the power of language, which is, in effect, the power to change people’s minds. When Luke describes something, he does it so powerfully that people actually see the thing he’s describing – in other words, he changes what they see, which amounts to changing what is.
ps: i was going to do the interview w/this guy as he is the one that interviewed her last yr and she went on tv saying that i’d had major plastic surgery to look like the presley’s (ugh)
I usually "forget" all the things I am scared of....like um, heights. I talk a big game all the time, "Yyyyyyyyeah, one day I'm TOTALLY gonna skydive, bungee off a bridge, maybe onto a cliff. Then dive into the Colorado River.....maybe para-sail off the coast of Africa...you know how it goes. Of course, this is all after I para-glide off the Alps next season."
Write our hearts promise to unite
In a small Texas town, (Mt. Vernon)
The only 'sickness' at work here is in the shape of a relatively new business deciding to drop it's trousers, crouch down and empty it's bowels upon every other firm in the sector - purely in order to make a splash, if you'll excuse the phrase.
I'm not ready for my life to change again, but obviously, it's too late. Oliver has arrived. I guess we might as well jump in with two feet if we're going to change our lives, right?
Place a layer of pasta sheets in the dish and spread the meat sauce over them. Pour some béchamel over the meat sauce, sprinkle over some parmesan cheese and cover with another layer of pasta sheets.
Postscript: It’s my unbridled pleasure to mention by way of epilogue that Deacon’s parents are expecting once again, and will add a third child to their family by the end of the year. Rejoice.
ASBO – Anti-Social Behaviour Order. Given to badly behaved people. About to be abolished by new British government.
TGIF Today God Is First Volume 1 by Os Hillman
I had left over paint samples from Benjamin Moore in a light shade so I used that for my primer on the back of the Merry Christmas sign. My Hubby came up and saw I was painting on our kitchen island and said I wouldn't let him do that...and he was right...I wouldn't.
Opportunities don’t always come to us. Most opportunities are created.
Any suggestions??
I'm still having a on & off affair with acne on my skin. There are days I'm blessed with the perfect skin that I can do makeup on like an artist painting on canvas. There are also days I'm cursed with the worse breakout that how I wish I don't have to step out of my doorstep. So picking up products that claimed to cure or even prevent acne are always top of my list when it comes to shopping whether is it online of physically.
Jesse James by Whitey & Hogan
I actually love the rug, it just wasn't right for the living room. Oh, and there's the part where our dog thinks area rugs = dog toilets. I know. I can see the rug as part of a future outdoor seating area, so I'm holding onto it for now. With the rug gone, the room feels a little bare, but I'm convinced it was the right decision. I also decided to re-paint the frame of the couch. It had already gone from espresso to black, but this time I decided to go from black to white.
There’s an e-petition opposing minimum pricing on the government website. I actually know someone called Chris Ward, but I don’t know whether it’s him (Edit: it’s not). So far sign-ups have been slow, but it’s early days yet. With my rudimentary MS Paint skills, I’ve designed a crappy little icon to promote it which can be seen in the left-hand sidebar. If you can do better, go ahead. E-mail me if you would like the code to put this on your blog or website.
“If it were left to me, which it seldom is in the power structure of writer versus editor, I’d probably not come cover this event again until there is a woman member,” Karen Crouse told GOLF.com. “More and more, the lack of a woman member is just a blue elephant in the room.”
Google’s attorney, J. Holtz, has reportedly said that the Commission had contacted the company about the complaints.
Seeing Clearly, Rel saw nothing of the surprise that ran through the Wilder, but her shiver showed in tiny movements of air, and her voice came high and startled. "You trust me now?" It wasn't sarcasm, and yet her tone was far more lively and human than he was used to from Wildren.
China hasn’t yet experienced a true innovation revolution. It will need time to evolve from a country of incremental innovation based on technology transfers to one where breakthrough innovation is common. The government will play a powerful role in that process, but ultimately it will be the actions of domestic companies and multinationals that dictate the pace of change—and determine who leads it.
Ok, I didn’t do this one and here’s why: I don’t have a pantry. When I did the “Week 2″ challenge, I also did this one. In fact, you might have noticed some items in the “before” images that weren’t in the “after” ones; well, I did not just throw away those items. This post is pretty image heavy, and I decided to not post EVERY picture of my cabinets. So…moving on.
It doesn't take much to get President Kennedy in the news, even though he's been dead for nearly 50 years. Did President McKinley have such a hold on the popular imagination in 1950? As well liked as McKinley was before his assassination, probably not.
Fabricated. All of it. In my final year of being in Manchester I was in a relationship with my daughter’s father. My final year of being single in Manchester? It had never been discussed. Without sitting down with a calender, I’d struggle to work out when that even was. Either way, I had certainly never had a relationship with a doctor, married or otherwise. During the interview, after racking my brains for romantic encounters following increasingly probing questions from the journalist, I had finally remembered a drunken snog I’d had with a friend of a friend on a night out around six months’ previously. He was a doctor, but he wasn’t married and there was certainly no relationship. We didn’t even exchange phone numbers.
I thank those of you who see that and support us and love wearing the clothes!!
Leaving the Station parallel to the railway, past an industrial estate (not quite the same rural charm as the station building), the path leads to a flooded Coombelands Lane. Before any passing traffic can drench me, I turn off up the footpath to Park Farm and on reaching the ridge, the Arun Valley opens out before me. Even in the drizzle, it’s a stunning view. And an ideal defensive position; the builders of Pulborough Castle obviously thought so. But not so strongly defended now – the site is on English Heritage’s At Risk Register.
At His name captives are freed
When we come back, we see Drew McIntyre and Heath Slater check out the next victim of Ryback.
Overall The Lip Balm Lab is a fab 'Creation Station' and I would highly recommend it for girls age 10+. This product retails for around £ 12.99, and is available to purchase here: http://www.interplayuk.com/products/lip_balm_laboratory.html
11. Notorious
I believe what Katie saw was real. I've had similar experiences myself. They're always subtle enough that they could be explained away as tricks of the mind or wishful thinking, but I don't think so. I'm a level-headed and rational science guy, but I know there are things out there that science can't explain. I may have my doubts about God sometimes, but I do believe in angels. Jill was an angel in life, and I truly believe she's still here in some form. Call me crazy, but I believe that with all my heart.
"Mr. Sharshar, I'm personally quite intrigued by your capabilities. Please tell me, how many missing persons have you helped locate this past year?"
From 1975 to 1979 Wonder Woman had her own TV series. I mention this not because it wasn't kind of cheesy (it was) or because it wasn't faithful to the character's origin (ditto), but because I was an impressionable pre-adolescent and because it featured (and I really cannot stress this point enough) Lynda Carter, who managed to be, for my generation, the definitive embodiment of this character in exactly the same way Christopher Reeve would be in 1978 when he first put on Superman's tights and cape:
I called Human Services on Monday. On Tuesday evening, the first of several home visits occurred. The social worker, a single mom with two kids of her own, grilled me mercilessly, for almost two hours . Where I had grown up? What was my nuclear family like? Had I ever been married? Had my parents ever hit me? Was I in a serious relationship? How did I feel about corporal punishment? Could I support the boys financially? What would I do if the boys got sick and had to stay home from school? Where would the boys sleep? Were my dogs friendly? Had they ever bitten anyone? Was I really serious about taking the boys permanently? Did I understand the commitment involved? Many of the questions had to do with race-- how was I, a single white woman, prepared to raise two African American boys? By the time the social worker left, I was exhausted. But aside from needing to drain the hot tub in the backyard (foster homes are not allowed to have trampolines or hot tubs) and put up a hand rail on the stairs to the unfinished basement, I had been approved.
"I am sure."
CALLER: Oh sure, I can talk with you. That'd be great.
Why do you need permission? Pinterest is fairly new and growing rapidly. Unfortunately, a lot of copyright laws are being violated so we have to be careful about what we’re pinning. I’m currently in the process of weeding through my hundreds of pins to remove anything that violates copyright and to make sure that I’m only pinning things that are okay to pin. This could take a while!!
Be the friend today. Be the objective one outside of the scene who challenges others to see the full story, who extends perspective, who offers hope. Be that person. Your friends will thank you.
She bursts out laughing and I hear her say the words “you” and “penis”, but that’s all I can make out. I’m horrified. Now she’s going to tell all her friends about it and they’re going to laugh too. It’s not like I wanted to see his nasty thing. Ugh!
One love!
In Egypt, a long process of discrimination in the public service began in 1929. In 1945-1948, Jews were excluded from the public service. In 1947, Jewish schools were put under surveillance and forced to Arabize and Egyptianize their curricula. Community organizations were forced to submit their member lists to the Egyptian state after May 1948 and until 1950. In 1949, Jews were forbidden to live in the vicinity of King Farouk's palaces.
4) I am completely overwhelmed at work, so overwhelmed that I just sit at my computer, staring dumbly into space, because I cannot figure out what to do first. And, after nine months on the (new) job, I have accumulated a grand total of 5 hours of leave time. I use it as fast as I get it because of doctors' visits, kiddo illnesses that call me out of the office, camp opening times that are not arranged with working families in mind, etc. Maybe, by Christmas, I will have accumulated enough time to take one extra day off.
It is God who deserves all the honor, glory, and praise!
Haraldur Levi Gunnarsson: drums
Two major things that I've done is replace the light in the kitchen and in the hallway. I've been debating over lights for months. Saw some lights that were a "maybe"...but "maybe" is just not good enough in my books. If you are going to stare at something on a daily basis, you better love it.
Prepare your potatoes- peel and chop into halves or quarters depending on size, place in bowl with enough olive oil to coat the potatoes, some chopped rosemary, a garlic clove and some red onion. Mix together in bowl.
I'll pray he has survived!
So, it’s 1972, and you’re an award-winning and iconic British movie studio whose attempt to reboot its Frankenstein series with a new continuity and a new actor turned out to be a bit of a disaster. What are you going to do?
# 2: Joining too many programs
You all amaze me on a daily basis. From your inspiring comments, inspiring blogs and inspiring reader space submissions. So you can imagine the joy gleaming from my face when another amazing reader sent me another completely inspiring organization project!
That said, do I believe malicious entities exist?
Wait a minute, though; is this a "gimmick film", as would be classified one by William Castle standards? You bet your flimsy concept it is, and not just any type of "gimmick film", but a "gimmick film" that uses its gimmick in probably about the most arbitrary way possible. And the worst part? Terror Is A Man really didn't need it.
After I got my money selling all Micheesha’s kids’ presents I took myself to Dundonald Ice Bowl for a skate.
Glamorous Review
Turn out onto a plate and serve warm.
Bow down before these gods who leach my spirit,
While AfriForum has instructed their lawyers to begin a legal battle to stop the street name changes in Pretoria, the Tshwane Metro Council has already proceeded with the changing of certain signboards. The Council’s actions amount to a blatant and contemptuous disregard for the processes of court, as rightly pointed out by AfriForum’s lawyers.
Once you get home place all the colors on the kitchen table. If your table is not white then use a white sheet or white paper for a neutral background. Once they are all out in front of you group together colors that you like and toss the ones you no longer like for your wedding.
The meal was "a triumph, Doug, though the turkey may have been a little overdone". Dinner entertainment was provided by some musical crackers we'd bought. In each cracker was a numbered whistle, eight in total. As conductor, I had a baton and notation for whistled carols. Not having enough people for all eight whistles, each person got two whistles each, which didn't bode well. The First Noel (321345 678765) was, quite frankly, a car crash, not helped by Emily putting near enough the whole whistle in her mouth so that her 5 and 6 notes were inaudible. She then proceeded to laugh so infectiously, no-one was able to purse their lips to make any useful noise at all. Deck the Halls was a tad too fast in the la-la-la bits but we had far more success with a sedate rendition of Jingle Bells possibly because there were none of George's 7s and 8s and lots of Rory's 3s. As Rory was the only one able to produce a pleasant sound from the whistle, I tried to choose songs with plenty of 3s and 4s in them. O Come All Ye Faithful was so painful, I'd suggest it as a more effective method of torture than waterboarding.
Only if you finish all your vegetables and tidy your room… I do a LOT of giveaways so keep an eye on my twitter @LilyCrussell and my facebook (just my name) sometimes I just give away sets of bookmarks on a spur of the moment in my statuses and whoever messages me first gets them. Unfortunately, I have a crappy retail job and don’t make a lot of money. I don’t buy things I need, I buy stamps, paper and ink. So sometimes I just can’t afford to be sending them out unfortunately. If I had the money, I would send EVERYONE some. I really do enjoy making them and love sending them out. It’s just a financial thing unfortunately. Keep an eye on my page as usually have some kind of giveaway going. I have two running at the mo, both end at the beginning of May. I’m looking into what I can do next.
The Kurt Vonnegut Memorial Library in Indianapolis is small but mighty. Offbeat tidbits from his life stock the displays, such as his Pall Mall cigarettes, Purple Heart medal, and the box where he kept his rejection letters. Each month the library frames a different letter and hangs it on the wall, ie:
What this means is that the form matters. And as forms go, social insurance – whether we’re talking about Old Age Insurance or Medicare or Unemployment Insurance – is something that is still nigh-universally understood and accepted by virtually all Americans. Social insurance fits into all the subconscious preferences within public opinion – it’s contributory and thus feeds into a commonweal rhetoric about “earned” rights; it’s universal and thus diffuses any separation between “us” and “them”; and since it’s tied to premiums taken out of paychecks, it bases itself on work (although not perfectly, since it also embraces dependents and the disabled).
So how did Clay really get the mohawk? Was your answer B or C? Personally, I'm not a big fan of mohawks, so I'm hoping one of your kids did it. Otherwise, that means you took him to the barbershop and gave him that haircut on purpose! (Sorry to be the only one not gushing about how great mohawks are. I wonder if my comment will even be published...)
I bumped into Rosie Perez twice in my years in Fort Greene/Clinton Hill, and even though I think I once scared the holycrap out of her (I got caught in a early-morning bleary-eyed stare at a giant canine that turned deer-in-celebrity-headlights moment) she was always cool.
If I live through this, I am totally suing somebody.
And that said - I need more ice cream, or dinner. I'll find something.
February 27, 1852
I have been an exceptionally lazy blogger this last week however life wise it’s all been go and the times I have sat down to write I haven’t found the words flowing as freely as I’d have hoped they would.
celebrating
Last semester, I took my last French class (ever!) which happened to be “Médias et cinema”. For this class, we were obligated to go on a little outing to watch Café de flore, a movie with the same writer and director as C.R.A.Z.Y., Jean-Marc Vallée. To be honest, I wasn’t looking forward to it. At all. Even after watching the trailer which I thought was intriguing, I had other ideas in mind on how to spend my Friday night rather than gathering with my entire French class to watch a French movie. Plus, it’s always strange to see your teacher out of the classroom.
Not that there aren't benefits, because there are. The summer always holds a promise of flexibility. The ability to jump in the car on any given day and go somewhere special. Trips to the beach, the library, afternoon movies, and maybe even a visit to see Bubby & Granddaddy in North Carolina.
The Soul Summit, a non-denominational church revival-slash- family reunion disguised as a House Music dance party (aren't they all though?) was a major event every Sunday from July to August for one brief Summer back round 2003 or so. But neighborhood grumblings pruned it down year after year until now it's nearly as easy to miss as Haley's Comet or some other fast moving celestial phenomenon. That being the case I went out and what essentially looks very much the same and different every year. In a word, it's "Family".
But I bet you still have a bit of belly fat.
Song:
WHIPPER SNAPPER
Anything But Ordinary by Avril Lavigne
The informal economies in townships and rural communities operate largely independently from the main-stream economy and yet are very vulnerable to it. Employment and income will only be created in this sector at an effective level if people are guided into spending on locally produced goods and services within their own community rather than by spending their limited resources in 'first-world' areas and on foreign goods. In most communities there is a great lack of spending power in terms of the national currency but local consumer power could be created by introducing a local complementary currency. This could be done by providing people with a basic (or citizen's) income in terms of such a currency.
Now that the wind has quieted down and the fire has turned cold,
The clemency-petition backlog rose 92 percent from 2005 to 2010, from 2,459 petitions to 4,714. Since the end of the 2010 fiscal year, the Obama administration reduced the backlog substantially by denying nearly 4,000 petitions while granting 17 pardons. The first nine of those were granted last December. “They are stellar at rejecting applications,” said P. S. Ruckman Jr., a political scientist at Rock Valley College in Rockford, Il. Focusing on processing times and averages “completely missed the point,” said Margaret Colgate Love, U.S. pardon attorney in the 1990s. The essential question, she said, is the quality of review. Love, who represents applicants for presidential pardons and sentence commutations, said “the pardon process is not serving the president” by giving the information he needs to make good decisions.
Strive this week to be a greater expression of Love than you were last week. Delve deeper into your Soul identity and infuse all your moments with the experience of being here as the Eternal Living Light of One Source. Prepare a physical home (your body) that welcomes this New inner alchemy of Christ consciousness so that it can be utilized as a channel of unified Source energy.
After his death, Romero’s wife, María Montes Vigil, married José Tenorio, who also came to New Mexico with the de Vargas expedition. This family, sans mother María, was living in Albuquerque at the time of the 1750 Spanish census. The census entry states that Tenorio is “widower of Maria Montes Vijil (sic), who had been married to Domingo Romero.” No last names are given for stepdaughter Juana Romero’s children.
In February, 154.871 million were in the labor pool; in March there were 154.707 million … a drop of 164,000. (chart below)
3So that any man who in error and without design has taken the life of another, may go in flight to them: and they will be safe places for you from him who has the right of punishment for blood.
And clearly saving the girl = getting involved.
As yet, a majority in the U.S. opposes strikes on Iran by either the U.S. or Israel. One factor is the meltdown of the occupation of Afghanistan. The massacre of 17 Afghan civilians, including nine children, by Staff Sgt. Robert Bales was only the latest in a series of events that prove it is no aberration. The Koran burnings, the desecration of Afghan corpses, the everyday brutality with which NATO soldiers treat civilians, [15] the continuing night raids that terrorize civilians, all reveal the barbarism and hatred pervading the occupation.
This song is the soundtrack to disappointment.
In another bowl beat the eggs, sugar, and zest until light and fluffy. Pour in a small amount of the chocolate and butter mixture. Mix well and add a smidge more. (This allows the temperature of the eggs to rise slowly and not scramble.) Add the rest of your chocolate and mix well.
4) Tomorrow, do it all over again…for the next 31 days.
Malaise.
*Mommy/Me is thankful for my family
A lone buzzard soars above Badnage Wood - a distant mew then silence. A swallow swoops to catch a last insect. Somewhere over there - way over there - a tractor works on. These short nights of summer make for long working days and silage must be cut.
39. Yesterday, I found this magic lamp and I asked the genie to let you to fall in love with me… did it work? -
Believe me, if I could I would probably turn back time to when we all wrote with quill pens. Although that wasn't so rosy either. Back in Jane Austen's time instead of writing dirty tweets people were, well, dirty. Even posh people only bathed about once a month, you had to pee in a chamber pot and had rotten teeth.
“No, Miss Jane, not exactly: you are genteel enough; you look like a lady, and it is as much as ever I expected of you: you were no beauty as a child,” said Bessie.
This is the backdrop to my latest “Great Little Berlin Moment”. After the service, a few of us decided to explore the area a bit. In the church right on Mariannenplatz, they have some incredible pictures up, showing how the Berlin Wall went right through the neighbourhood, literally running maybe 20 metres behind the church. We also read about a Turkish immigrant guy who spotted a piece of wasteland near his home, and decided to grow some vegetables there. Turns out that piece of land officially belonged to East Berlin, but had ended up on the western side of the Wall. Something to do with building the Wall in a straight line and not wasting ressources by building around that little plot. Anyway, the East German border guards weren’t too pleased with Mr Kalin (that was his name) digging up their land but eventually, after a lot of toing and froing they let him get on with it, as he was a poor immigrant suffering under the Capitalist system and having to grow his own food. Great story!
“God, like your servant Stephen, I am ready,” Kata prayed through the pain. When heaven did not open, the pastor changed his prayer. “Help me stand firm. Use me to build Your church here!”
Together we can make the right choice for Longmont.
The Plan of Salvation McKnight is well aware that the typical evangelical plan of salvation emerges from the actual gospel. Nevertheless, he recognizes the deep seated problem that we’ve largely forgotten the story from which salvation has come. We’re left with a message that has no roots.
Still the cracks allow this to be split in two
Really.
Since then my chilli recipe has developed a wee bit. There was a moment there, where I tried a mushroomless version to please the Frog, but that was just wrong, so the mushies are back.
Then we prayed with her.
“Three of us new lads,” he told me, “were asked to go and see the local doctor to have a ‘check up’ to see if we were ‘fit’ due the nature of the job we were going to do – lifting heavy metal and so on…
CTMH Stamp set- Dainty Thoughts
Sam.
In contrast, only 33% white and Indian youth want to go, reflecting a hardening of attitudes among black youngsters who have increasingly lost confidence in government.
Some of my favorite songs here were the Rum Tum Tugger, Memory (duh), Mr. Mistoffelees and Mungojerry and Rumpleteaser.
Stella is much better now and we are home. Luckily for us we were only away a few days but in that was enough time to miss Kate changing me from Mumma to Mummy. Oh how I will miss her "Mumma."
We are still off on vacation in Orlando, Florida and today my twins dance team will perform at the 2012 Dance Worlds Competition at Epcot. Please say a little prayer for their team to do their personal best, that's all we can ask for!!!
Sat 22 @ Harpa - Reykjavík Concert Hall
Below are two FOTD’s with the two blushes. Unfortunately, one seems to have been taken with sunlight while the other just daylight so they’re different hues. Hope it helps anyway.
Yet there was something on that other hand I had to examine more closely. ”On the other hand, you won’t have any time to work on your book.” Um, okay. That’s going to stop me from teaching? Not being able to work on editing a book that will likely never be published? Come on, other hand. What about all of the practical things like having to buy a car or not making enough money to survive or never having taken chemistry and being expected to teach it? Don’t you want to bring those up and wave them in my face?
PRICE: You sure you want to do this? Fine, if you have $10.39 in cash, you can buy the standard version of Dork Diaries 2 on Amazon, saving $2.60 and 20% of the savings, buy it new for $2.88, or buy it used for $1.10 if you want to save money. Barnes & Noble sells the book for an even more expensive $10.98 for 15% saved, but if you want to save money and get even more savings, the marketplace edition, selling at $1.11 for 91% saved, is the only way to go.
Here’s and FYI: For all our Northwest readers:
Futsal time at night with a bunch of friends was a great time to have. I was staying away from futsal for 10days long, not counted football as I was just played football in Ipoh with ex-schoolmate. Futsal was the main part in my sport arena that I couldn’t see the separation between me and ball. Let’s check out for tomorrow event that I am about going to PPUKM for my case collection. I am denying to go at first, but ended up decided to go with them.
Overall a lot of fun, no 4th round again due to overwhelming victory by Orboros, and at least this time people looked at my army with a little more fear than last time. It’s a nice and fun as all hell list and I just can’t get enough of Vlad.
2T molasses
II. Reflections on Freedom of Speech and the First Amendment (University Press of Kentucky, 2007)
So without much further ado I chose to take a holiday to what is known as the Mother City. For those of you not familiar with Cape Town it is basically the San Francisco of Africa. I could elaborate on that comparison but I won’t.
You all were super amazing last year and submitted your votes... and Simplicity placed in the top 5 of WDIV's Vote 4 the Best Contest. Thank you soooo much for your support.
beginning this five-minute-a-day blog is an excercize in beating that inner perfectionist to death.
When I was a kid, my cousins called me this. I told my friend Alyza about this and she started calling me “Matsing” or even “Matchi” for short. Sadly, I respond to this nickname.
Level 11: MP Cost: 30, Duration: 330 seconds, All Stats: +6%.
Surprised fear crossed the Elf’s face.
As grand as Machu Picchu is, it was only inhabited for about 100 years. As the Spanish approached, the Inca evacuated in the mid 1500’s allowing the lush vegetation to quickly reclaim the city. Sacred stones that were destroyed in other cities the conquistadors plundered were left untouched, leaving Machu Picchu a largely intact archeological site.
I remember just being like "ya Ned that sounds cool", but I didn't really dig it as much as I liked my idea at the time. Thinking about it now though, my idea was awful, and Title Fight definitely is better than what I thought was a good idea.
Therefore I now calculate that I shall need 384 x 4" squares.
I hope my readers will stay with me and won’t mind this new change. Everything’s still the same!
THE DECLINE OF THE AMERICAN EMPIRE (Canada) directed by Denys Arcand
He urged the people to lend their support to the idea adding that such an organisation would need all kinds of resources including a team of very focused people with the ability to work with other organisations that are sympathetic to the objectives of DayMove.
· Walk into a valley and look up.
Verily, Allah has purchased of the believers their lives and their properties; for the price that theirs shall be the Paradise. They fight in Allah’s Cause, so they kill (others) and are killed. It Is a promise in truth which is binding on Him in the Torah and the Gospel and the Qur’an. And who is truer to his covenant than Allah? Then rejoice in the bargain which you have concluded. That is the supreme success. (V.9:111).
I remember Patrick kneeling beside me that morning. The memory will forever be etched on my heart.
*Congratulate me. I can go to downtown now all by myself. I can ride a jeep without hesitation and can roam around Colon and Carbon without feeling awkward.
The interior of Indigo CS are usually unique, exciting a fascinating. Their petrol plus diesel variations are obtainable with beige homes, elegant upholstery, together with leather-wrapped gearshift knob. The most fascinating portion of the Indigo’s interior may be the instrument chaos with a light intensity adapting feature.
Next up: Guns! AND Religion!Yes,soon you will be allowed to bring your handgun to church with you. If your pastor says it's OK. It's just like the Bible says, "Jesus wept because the Pharasees wouldn't let him bring his Glock into the Temple. So he passed a law and busted a cap in their asses."
Gremlins
"I don’t believe in charity. I believe in solidarity. Charity is so vertical. It goes from the top to the bottom. Solidarity is horizontal. It respects the other person. I have a lot to learn from other people.” – Eduardo Galeano
What do you all do when it's hot in the afternoon and there's no nap in sight? I'd love some input!
The Right 2 Know campaign argued the DA's decision "flies in the face of its stated commitment to press freedom and transparency." How, exactly, it did not say. Ronald Suresh Roberts argued "The DA's illiberal logic merely confirms its loosening grip upon its own unearned ‘liberal, reputation"', but had no explanation for way the right not to speak was illiberal.
What we all want more of is time, time to concentrate on "just writing" and that's why writers' retreats are so popular. You go somewhere remote and rural, without a phone signal, and divest yourself of all the things that aren't writing. You even have surrogate wives to cook for you. But it costs; it's a rare treat.
In other musings, yesterday my husband dropped off some trellis he had constructed along with wooden flowers and things (free of charge) for a project at school. The school sits on a hill and is surrounded by a field. He decided to drive down the field in his new truck to drop off said items. On the way back up he got stuck (it rained all day yesterday). In hindsight, actually I'd go so far as to say you didn't need hindsight, he realised that this wasn't the best idea he'd had in a long time. In fact, its something that would be in my locker not his! So after reversing, a lot of tooing, froing and messing up the field he had to call out a recovery chappie - £120.00 later the truck is released from the school field.
Life has a way of doing that, moving in fast forward at times.
In Harare last week, firemen went on strike because they were too hungry to work.
First of all, both are totalitarian ideologies. The totalitarian nature of Political Correctness is revealed nowhere more clearly than on college campuses, many of which at this point are small ivy covered North Koreas, where the student or faculty member who dares to cross any of the lines set up by the gender feminist or the homosexual-rights activists, or the local black or Hispanic group, or any of the other sainted “victims” groups that PC revolves around, face formal charges – some star-chamber proceeding – and punishment. That is a little look into the future that Political Correctness intends for the nation as a whole. The fact of the matter is that Political Correctness has a history, a history that is much longer than many people are aware of outside a small group of academics who have studied this. And the history goes back, as I said, to World War I, as do so many of the pathologies that are today bringing our society, and indeed our culture, down.
Upon arrival to Atalaya get a small hostal near the port and settle in here until the next boat to Pucallpa, see how long it takes.
It was summer time and the royal family made their annual move . It was a short trip only thirty-five miles north to nearby Segovia. There, at the foot of the forested northern slopes of the Sierra de Guadarrama, was a magnificent summer palace; La Granja de San Ildefonso.
On hearing that there is no cure for tinnitus, they may feel a state of helplessness and despair. Such type of negative counseling should be given by the doctors. There are solutions!
The middle school softball team increased their record to 3 and 1 last night by defeating Rocky River 14 to 7. Leading the girls defensively was Carley Skettle who made 7 outstanding plays!
Apparently, nursing staff at the hospital decided to bad mouth me and several other physicians, in the hearing of my patient. Apparently she overheard them say that I was lazy (because I don’t take call) and that I didn’t know what I was doing, that the medications she was on was not appropriate, etc. She states that she heard many other comments not only about me, but about most of the other physicians in the hospital.
Six years later, I fell in love again the day my second son was born. September 26, 2008 Jackson James entered my world. I had a rough pregnancy with Jackson, suffering from antepartum depression but when that little boy popped out, I was overcome with love.
Last Friday Andrew and I had dinner with a few people at a friend's house. I can't remember when, I think after our first loss, I found out that our friend Nicole had a 6 week loss. On either side of that loss, she has two beautiful girls, ages 6 and 1 and a half. Other than that loss, Nicole has lost a lot of people in her life. It's probably hard for people to understand the immensity of her losses when most people have only lost a couple people in their lives by their mid-20's. I don't mean to diminish anyone’s loss, losing even one person in your life is difficult, but I think that when several people in your life die, it definitely takes its toll on you. It's also different when it's your grandparents, who lived long and fulfilling lives, compared to your sister, who left behind her two kids. I don't think she gets to really talk about it. Well, once in awhile you just need a pity party and isn't alcohol always the best catalyst for it?
For I am the LORD, I change not; Mal. 3:6
Félicitations !
So what is this event about?
Last week I was stunned by the weather and how fast everything was drying and how hot I was shifting bricks and splitting pallets around in the blazing sunshine. Well at the moment it's about 1 degree C outside and yesterday it was snowing the whole day. The snow didn't stick at all where we are thankfully but there is a good bit on the hills. I have chilly fingers typing this morning.
forward."
To Cindy, Sandra, Jella, and Lisa...
So, here I am on a Sunday afternoon, working on my lesson plan for my observation and I lost it. Every single thought goes through my mind...how do I start packing up my classroom? How do I interview for a job immediately after giving birth? How do I leave my "family" and start over? And the scariest question of all (thanks E for asking it), What if I don't get a job?
If there is not a local store you are able to shop at, mail order is the next best thing. For that reason, I’m 100% behind all catholic retailers. But you’ve got to support your local shop, because they do a work the mail-order folks can’t do. Mine:
Ilario Bertuccio
However, it's come to my attention that not all of my blog readers have found what they need, and they're having a hard time putting out a call for crit partners on their own blogs because of traffic. Some of them are really good too -- agented or published or close to agented or published, and they need someone at that level. Others are just starting out.
Jen x
And about those secret resorts… So supposedly when all those those P-Hil-ish celebrit-type folk were over here, in those secret clubs and resorts. They were in the hot springs hotel by the library, the renovated hotel up the street from our old house, all those little hot spring resorts we never checked out. I hear Thom Yorke was DJing in some hotel nearby, Snoop Dogg was taking five somewhere in driving distance. I couldn’t find them.
And while I mock and tease those who are excited about the first snow, secretly I adore winter. This season always invokes wonderful memories of my childhood past, from snow ball fights and snow angels, to creating paper snowflakes, to being surrounded in family. Longings deep within my soul whirl around like fall leaves caught in a gust of wind.
Students and professors who use hateful anti-Jewish rhetoric and imagery, who actively promote the dismantling of the Jewish State, and who support terrorism against Jews, do act to create a hostile and threatening environment for many Jewish students, some of whom report at times feeling physically unsafe, emotionally and intellectually harassed and intimidated by peers and professors, isolated from their fellow students, and unfairly treated by faculty and administrators. As a result of their experience of campus antisemitism, some students have even reported leaving the university, dropping classes, changing fields of study, avoiding certain parts of campus, and hiding symbols of their Jewishness. (via http://www.campusantisemitism.org/?page_id=12)
And YES, we are still delighted to take your Custom Orders, as that is what we do the best!
Messages from Your Angels;
Here’s the photo prompt for #Friday Fictioneers courtesy of Madison Woods. Thanks Madison, for starting and continuing this wonderful writing prompt. Please visit her site and check out all the other Friday Fictioneers
Anyway, a great baker there named Vicky needed some new signs for her display.
The confusion is understandable. Establishing exactly when and where Jennie Jerome was born has taken some diligent detective work. There are no birth records for Brooklyn before 1866, and Jennie left some misleading clues for the historians who began tracking down the details of her life once it became obvious she had given birth to greatness, when her son led Great Britain through World War II and the island nation was all that stood between Hitler and complete domination of Europe.
I have friends who have long had S.A.D. (seasonal affective disorder), and thankfully I do not suffer from this, because they basically go into a social coma every year between October and May. But at the same time, there's only so much shitty weather you can stand. Look, we get it, you're a wet city, in a wet half of the state, in a wet region of the country. But for god's sake, we need the sunshine just like everyone else in the world. Vitamin D deficiency is nearly universal in this part of the country, which has real affects on the body. All we want is a little sunshine and the opportunity to enjoy our beautiful natural scenery that surrounds this beautiful city. Give us some peace.
Anyway, after hunkering down in my cube today for eight hours, my plans involve a last minute straightening out of my home before JW’s bff BR heads into town for a long weekend of celebrating Irish heritage and enjoying Chicago in general.
www.inspirescrapboutique@blogspot.com
* You take pictures of your reunion and ask any deceased relatives to join in.
Finally, we got to the top: Google Cloud Music beta recently released and Amazon Cloud Player Lets You Play Your Music From Anywhere. Both of them did so without securing licensing rights from record labels but have maintained that their services are completely legal, as users can only upload own purchased music.
I found a roommate from the customers at the bar I worked at full time again private dancing: Jon Neil.
Instead, we sipped our drinks, tried to relax and did some major people watching. So, I guess the night wasn't completely void of good entertainment. A few people tripped in hilarious drunkenness. A few more slobbered out things they're sure to regret later. And the cherry on top - my husband's dad performed a solo dance around a small fire to "the chicken dance" while waving a palm branch.
An Inspector Calls 1954 Hollywood Movie Watch Online Full Movie
In obscure irrational thought
winter sun
See you soon. I love you so.
In this, he was helped by Strayhorn, who had enjoyed a more thorough training in the forms associated with classical music than Ellington. The first of these, “Black, Brown, and Beige” (1943), was dedicated to telling the story of African-Americans, and the place of slavery and the church in their history. Ellington debuted Black, Brown and Beige inCarnegie Hall on January 23, 1943, beginning a series of concerts there suited to displaying Ellington’s longer works. While some jazz musicians had played at Carnegie Hall before, few had performed anything as elaborate as Ellington’s work.
UN55C8000 Samsung 55″ LED 3D HDTV – Review
I didn’t think so!
ourselves side by side,
The heart grows older but never ever learns
And the CIA station chief who met Osama in﻿ hospital in July 2001 was, reportedly, Larry Mitchell.
“Self-censorship”
Saturday, April 28th, 2012 @ 03:40 pm
The truths of the great religions have been tested, not in radio studios but in human lives. Look at the deeply religious beliefs of Mahatma Gandhi or Martin Luther King.
I scurried off as Pat just looked at me. Why didn't he blame Cassie? Why think it was poor little old me? Just because my guilty look he was able to see. Oh I need to get a better poker face or run away at a faster pace. Okay, shut up Pat and all of you. I knocked the laptop on the ground and hid it from view. There you happy now? Why are you scolding me? It still works some how.
and seas
By Timely's Dec/49 cover dated issues, publisher Martin Goodman and editor-in-chief Stan Lee further tried to distance themselves from the swirling hysteria, now touting their "Marvel Comics" line as "good reading". They brought back Goodman's old Red Circle-like pulp colophon from the late 1930's, now a circular Marvel Comics bullet on the cover of nearly every issue published between cover dates Feb/49 and June/50, (Dec/48 and Feb/50 "real" time). Dr. Jean Thompson is prominently displayed in the ad:
This is a great beginning, a good preparation and transition to Shabda Meditation. I am giving out this to all who come in contact with me, recommending it as a great way to begin meditating right now. NOTE: Meditation practice accompanies a life of Ahimsa: non-violence in thought, word, and deed. Be peaceful on the outside as well as within. “When you learn the methods for inner meditation, you should practice diligently. Moral rectitude is also very essential in this pursuit. ” (Sant Sevi Ji Paramahans Maharaj)
That will make us increasingly energy independent and lessen the strategic importance of OPEC. It is also the latest of many reasons why predictions of American decline are so overwrought.
Let me make one last suggestion. Please make sure you make a small contribution to the other charities that didn’t win. After all, it is the season for giving…..and everyone wins that way!!
Afterwards we headed to the bookstore, where I kept getting distracted, then home to take a shower and wind down.
Today I attended the baby shower for her newest bundle of joy. (They are expecting a little girl, and she is trying hard to make an early appearance. So my very type-A personality friend finds herself stuck on bedrest (going on 2 weeks), and a little stir-crazy.) The shower was a great chance to spend time together and celebrate her joy.
Do you have a favorite?
I registered for the May 12th event in PA. One day before my birthday.
Electric pressure washers are the most effective cleaning equipment for all kind of commercial and industrial cleaning applications. Checkout various features of electric powered pressure washers which make it so effective.
Shag did a little dance of happiness and barked his appreciation. Moon looked down the beach to see his master, sitting on a wall and looking out into the sea, he looked sad and deep in thought. Moon turned quickly back to Shag.
Going to a Jeanette Winterson reading is like going to a religious rally. Here are the kinds of crowds you don't often see at at a literary reading, people you've never seen before and those you haven't seen for years: a man with a beard comes up to me and says 'Hello! ... Oh dear, you don't recognise me!' and I say, 'Yes, I do, you're X!' (from long ago) and he says, 'No, no, I'm Y!' He's a man I knew in a time even before that, when Jeanette Winterson published Oranges Are Not the Only Fruit. And they're all here, the people who read that book then and have read it since, and this is what the whole thing's about, because this is an event for Winterson's new book, Why Be Happy When You Could Be Normal? which her publishers call a memoir but which she will tell us is a new 'cover' of the same story.
I also think the walk is good for my high-energy little boy. I wonder what a few miles a week will do for him. Will it impact his attention span? Will it calm him down? Will it make him a better reader? Or artist? It might.
· Featured on NBC’s “The TODAY Show” June 2004
His heart rate began to drop. Between each contraction, Lori was telling me to breathe oxygen to my baby. I did my best to follow her instructions through the extreme fatigue. It became very serious when Lori announced that they needed to get the doctor and the vacuum in the room. I heard this and even
And allow it to show him what happiness it could bring
Marcia Hillis
Helen Heightsman Gordon, M.A., Ed.D.: Dr. Gordon published five textbooks while a Professor of English at Bakersfield College, Bakersfield, California, as well as numerous articles, opinion pieces, and humor, in scholarly journals, newspapers, and professional newsletters. Her poetry has been published in such diverse venues as Amelia, Gray’s Sporting Journal, Good Housekeeping, and the Salt Lake Tribune. Her chapbooks of poetry and humor are available online. In 2007, she won first prize in the “Best Historical Novel” category at Hollywood Book Festival for her first novel, Voice of the Vanquished: The Story of the Slave Marina and Hernan Cortes. In 2008, she ranked among finalists in the category of “Best New Non-Fiction Books,” (sponsored by USA Book News), for her second edition of The Secret Love Story in Shakespeare’s Sonnets. Her interest in solving the puzzling 1609 Dedication to the sonnets led her to explore the effects of Rosicrucianism and Freemasonry upon 16th century literature.
Saturday, Oct. 14: Blackstar Co-op Brewpub's Oktoberfest Party at Austin Homebrew Supply — man, I hate to miss this one, as it's in my neighborhood! Always good to have beer-drinking opportunities that are walking distance from your house. No driving means more beer!
The guys told us about the ways we would be allowed to kill each other. We were given Rubber snakes, spiders, and scorpions to slip into bags or onto chairs. Red yarn to be laid as trip wires for people to step over. Rubber daggers to slip into pockets for bonus points. Golden star stickers to put on food wrappers to be considered poison. Cameras could be used to get "head shots" on people. Then my favorite method of all - the "shiv". The shiv was a baby sock full of talc powder. You sneak up on someone and stab them with it leaving the tell-tale white mark on their clothes. Each method of "murder" was assigned different point values according to their difficulty. He let us each choose which weapons we wanted to carry with us and he gave us each five kill slips to carry with us. When someone killed us we had to sign our name to it and write how they killed us and give it to them to bring downstairs. IF we got killed we lost points if we turned in kills we gained points. We could always get more slips if we ran out and there would be a finale scenario we had to run through at the end.
Why are you not afraid of the waves? Because waves are a natural part of the ocean.
“The Great Lakes are big waters; you think of things happening slowly in such big waters. This was relatively rapid.”
Jackie Lee's single version of "Inigo Pipkin" is significantly different from the television theme tune, sadly. Here she seems to have gone for a little bit of a reggae lilt, which is a bit silly given that the show couldn't have been less Jamaican or urban. It's impossible to destroy the track's charm's completely, though, and its original intentions shine through.
Who could resist right?
You can share some of your ideas below or copy & paste and work on your lists on your own time. But sharing a few ideas is fun, because it might help out someone else!
We are in no way interested in dinner and decide to relax at our villa . . . enjoying olives, cheese, pistachios, and of course Prosecco. Linda has thoughtfully brought a trivia game for foodies, and we enjoy many more laughs!
the Lord invites us to eat
Prayer: Lord, help me by your grace to remain a faithful servant to you. Teach me the true way of life of a Christian by your Word, so I may become your sheep and you, my shepherd. I want to be close to you and no other, for there is no one else who can grant eternal life with the Father except you.
A Streamlight TL2 tactical light, clipped in my left front pocket (although I am having serious issues with the fact that the light keeps getting turned on in my pocket. 120 lumen, confined within a trouser pocket, gets hot in a hurry!). I'm not going to use a weapon-mounted light (WML) on my sidearm to conduct a house search. Remember, although she's not ambulatory, I DO have a child in the house. I'd feel like a dick if I inadvertently pointed a weapon at her because I was looking for the source of a strange bump in the night.
HMS Severn was affiliated with the city of Newport in September 2003 and awarded the freedom of the city in June 2006.
WET. That's the word to describe the weather here in Malaysia. It's unusually cool in usually sunny Malaysia. My laundry is not dry. I am not pleased. Yes the rain is great. It leaves an after chill. It makes your body want to sleep and sleep some more. Sometimes, you even don't have to switch on the fan.
The controls are pretty appalling. Just all round janky and not very user friendly. I stumbled my way into the odd death here and there just from bad control design but overall it was more of a pain in the ass than a game breaker.
The Great Escape (dir. John Sturges, 1963)
But if you do want followers, there are a few things you should take care of first.
The world may never know.
"Don't let go of me yet, darling. I've got several other bits that need kissing too." Demetrius' voice was weak, but he was talking. He was alive.
It was a terrible fall--
Frankie started to explain. I tried to wrap myself in a towel but my mom warned me against it saying that if I had glass on my body the towel could cause the glass to cut me. My mom and Aunt Kathleen started to inspect my head and body for shards of glass. It was a difficult task due to me being soaking wet. They asked me if I was okay.
Thanks -
This would mean we have 5, 2 and 2.5 against 3 and 4.
To please her fur babies she bought a deluxe bird feeder for the back yard.
Am I working on them? Um...well, clearly, no. No, I'm not. I'm too fried. I can't even open them.
It is important to keep the apple bag straps flat,
Want to come over to my house for a drink?
Well now that we know their ethnicity, can any one work out how that would have risked identifying their victims as the police said it might?
DR MAROON: The votes are in!
12. What are two things to do when you’re covering a beat? What are two things not to do when you’re covering a beat?
He has been healing really well and wakes up more and more each day as they wean his sedation and pain medication. He is still pretty tired but has mostly happy awake time. He has been smiling and actively playing with his toys. It brings me such JOY to see him want to move and act like a normal little baby.
Please visit her blog HERE to read all about this amazing woman who did things for the honor and glory of God; it is a story of the life of a wonderful woman worth sharing.
They are giving the winner 2 images of their choice. Thanks so much!
On marble dark grey vinyl in Snappy's one size fits all sleeve. Check it out:
ones were on special at Superstore and who could resist on a Friday afternoon with a storm brewing outside? Not me, they bring a little sunshine to my life ;)
To give an example, it’s not only the destination of attacks and magic spells which you can’t control. When I’ve used a potion on one of my four characters, sometimes they’ll turn round and give it to someone else (who’s usually more in need of it, to be fair, but equally not what I wanted them to do). This then leaves them with just as little health as before, and when there doesn’t seem to be any constancy of speed or agility during battle– the usual factors determining who goes first in turn-based battles– they more often than not kick the bucket on the next turn because apparently they drew the short straw in the battle order (and when they’re the only one holding all the phoenix downs, you’re even more stuck).
Young at Heart – Always a little kid. I can watch cartoons all day and not feel ashamed. I am also extremely trusting, honest, and silly…and it still takes me like 5 minutes longer than anyone else to get a dirty joke.
The vast majority of us aren’t about to venture into microfinance in the next 30 days. But we could learn a lot from the spirit of Sasha’s experiment. It could be life changing to make a commitment to God:
The fight for full funding for peer support centers in Tennessee has made progress. Governor Haslam has announced an amendment to his original budget which restores part of the money scheduled to be cut out of the budget for peer support centers in Tennessee. The new amendment still cuts $1,000,000 and means almost a 20%cut in services. The fight is not over yet.
I chose images from Raisin Boat. Raisin Boat is a rental based stamp company (similar to Netflx) in which you "rent out" stamp sets, use them and then return them and receive more. I liked this set so much that I bought it outright.
Cranberry Nut
When you write on a blog it can be very personal and also offer some great information so this is a very effective way to promote your business on a social networking site. With social network blogs you are allowing people to get to know you on a more personal level which builds a good relationship with your potential customers.
There are always so many things to be grateful for. And noticing these amazing things can really help us to shift into our 'now.' Here are some of mine in this now.
Legend has it, and some historical accounts may prove this too, that crusaders themselves used to carry, on the way to their quest, slabs of what was described as a durable confection made with honey and sugar syrup, spices, nuts and dried fruits: Panforte, that is.
Sometimes, I'm obsessive compulsive to the point that even I get sick of myself, literally. I usually try variations on a single recipe and different recipes relating to the same thing for days on end until I satisfy myself that the recipe is the one I want as my "to go to" recipe, or the one recipe I'm willing to replicate to eat for the immediate future.
We ended up leaving around 1pm. And headed home. As we pulled into the driveway, I realized that Leigh was having her Cookie-Lee Jewelry party. Oh crap. I was supposed to go to it! It was 1:30, and I was SO supposed to be there!
The funny (?) thing is- some of the worst driving in London is carried out by minicab and private hire cars. In fact not just in London but all over! To stereotype, minicab drivers do not use their mirrors properly, do not signal, change lanes irratically, overtake too close, shout out the window at cyclists doing legal, sensible and advised manouvers and generally are a pain in the cyclists butt (or wherever they get hit…). Luckily Mr Griffin doesn’t think the “rules” apply to his private hire cars. As a clear expert on the subject, Griffin has got himself in trouble earlier in the week by advising his drivers to drive illegally in the bus lanes as he would reimburse any fines incurred by doing this.
Many people see Steampunk as escapist, but some see it as a way to change the world. How do you see it, and are you right? Come find out!
"For General Motors, a good deal of the company’s recovery from its brush with bankruptcy is riding on the Chevrolet Volt (Opel or Vauxhall Ampera in Europe), its plug-in hybrid electric vehicle launched a year ago. Not that GM expects the sleek four-seater to be a cash cow. Indeed, the car company loses money on every one it makes. But the $41,000 (before tax breaks) Chevy Volt is a “halo” car designed to show the world what GM is capable of, and to lure customers into dealers’ showrooms—to marvel at the vehicle’s ingenious technology and its fuel economy of 60 miles per gallon (3.9litres/100km)—and then to drive off in one or other of GM’s bread-and-butter models."Stated otherwise, the "Volt" brand is being promoted no less for the broader message that the brand is intended to convey about the technological capabilities of a reborn General Motors than for the the direct sales potential of the model (at least for the foreseeable future, which remains uncertain). While the Volt is not exactly a loss-leader, I am sure that GM wants to make a lot of money on this vehicle, if for no other reason than the costs of bringing a new car model to market. Still, the current tribulations of the Volt car point to the fact that GE cannot really allow customer perception of the vehicle as a symbol of the company's technological prowess, even if the model itself is not directly contributing to the company's bottom line.
Sunday who believe they have supernatural powers
And that’s where the choice lie comes in.
I don’t have an age or size limit on how long my child, or any child should be carried. I try to pick up all my daughter’s friends for a hug when I see them. Kids like being picked up generally. If not, I of course respect those wishes.
So it was much easier just to have sex.
Along the road in Texas, I saw billboards encouraging me to Stop in Shamrock, so when the exit rolled up alongside us, I slid off I-40 and headed into town. I mean, with my Irish heritage, and a town named Shamrock… what else could I do? I didn’t recall stopping there before, so why not now?
Tuesday: make fondant
The sheer joy and excitement that I hoped to share in for just a moment if I could not steal another!
Céline: …and that I taught them to care and respect women!
Stability is the fundamental mandate of the water empire. Free enterprise with its disruptive activity and its constantly shifting social order is a tsunami that overwhelms the water empire, flooding its canals and swamping its bureaucracies. The water empire only works when everyone knows his place and knows that this place is fundamentally unchangeable. While this attitude seems alien to most Americans, it has been cultivated assiduously in racial politics. The urban blight is a symptom.
YouTube blurb beneath the video:
javascript:alert (1 + Math.floor (Math.random () * 100));
Under the light of million stars I pray to meet you. I pray to have you in my arms. I really miss you, honey. I really do.
Luckily, the kale survived the entire day as well as the following day's 14 hour train journey from Monterosso to Paris. I returned home to a happy Sir Lancelot who was excited for his first raw kale salad in months! Not to mention he brought me some kale surprises from America! It was a true kale party in Chez Lancelot!
He gets clocked, then they swarm on him like a pack of wolves.
It is morning in the house of Najiya. General Najiya, Anwaar, and Fareda are about to have breakfast. There is a small table in the middle of the room. The table is surrounded by large pillows that function as seats. General Najiya is seated at the left side of the table. Anwaar and Fareda are seated next to each other. The servants enter bringing the breakfast. After serving the family, the servants will stand behind Anwaar and Fareda.
Jess
I feel perfect. It hurts me to say I am not perfect. So I need to keep my distance from judgemental/critcal people whether they are judging me or themselves.
So why do we color eggs? Here’s trivia that you may have a more difficult time finding. Folklore suggests that the man who carried Christ’s cross when He could no longer carry it Himself, Simon of Cyrene, was an eggler by trade. When Simon returned to his home, he found that his eggs had been beautifully and fantastically decorated, presumably a Divine blessing for Simon’s help. This story led to the coloring of eggs at Easter.
-Plus, completely ignoring Emma means he wasn’t just deciding not to care about her, but that he no longer cared about ANYONE from his homeland-including dear, old dad.
“Hmm, it seems you have some kind of problem in ze chestal area,” he diagnosed. “Remove ze upper garments, if you please.”
Pepper futures traded within a tight range since the buyers and sellers waited for further directional cues. Market lacked fresh triggers to catch up momentum. Spot prices remained steady and traded near Rs 27000 per quintal. International price for MG1 traded within a range of $6200 to $6350 per ton and except MG1 grade, prices of all other origins increased. Arrivals were reported in Indonesia and Malaysia and as per media reports production expectation from these countries are not encouraging. As per IPC estimates the production in Indonesia is expected around 37000 tons while that of Malaysia and Brazil were expected near 25000 tons and 34000 tons respectively. Harvesting in Brazil is expected to start from August onwards. However Vietnam decision to increase the export quota can increase the supply in international market. Vietnam had already exported 54480 tons of pepper which is expected to be half of its yearly production.
So even though I wish I had 6 extra hands today, and two extra laps (mama's lap is prime real estate around here when everyone is sick), I am happy, joyful even. God is good. He has surrounded me with soooo much love, so many reminders of my worth to Him (in the forms of little souls I am responsible for for a little while): it just makes me smile.
1 confounded
Kissing the top of her head and holding her close, DJ raised an eyebrow at his father.
But this year I am not screwing up the hubby's family Christmas bash! Oh No! Not me! I am trying to prepare early.
high numbers of nonviolent, lower-risk criminals have been swept up in the prison boom. Getting tough on them has gotten tough on taxpayers, without an adequate public safety benefit. A prison cell costs about $65,000 to build and $24,000 a year to operate. States spend nearly $50 billion a year on corrections, more than four times the amount from 20 years ago, and they are projected to spend an additional $25 billion over the next five years to accommodate more inmates.
She took me 2 her castle
We talked yet again of this analogy with our children last night. Asa is bringing the grill, Sherrad the ice chest, Virginia has the blanket, Jasper has the buns and chips. Today Sherrad didn’t like the way Asa was acting and said, “I don’t like the grill you’re bringing!”
Very very lucky.
“Please.” I could feel him.
Dispatches asked several people if this was ethical method for a former premier. Dr Nicholas Allen, an expert on standards in public life at the University of London, said, “It is not altogether clear that Blair is separating his work as the representative of the Office of the Quartet and his business interests.
So I’ve trogged round catacombs and crypts, visited ossuaries under the Vatican, shaken hands with the mummified Crusader in Dublin, studied the reconstructed victims of Pompeii, listened to the Last Post at the Menin Gate and left flowers for Édith Piaf in Père Lachaise.
Warning: This post contains language that could be construed as advice. Proceed with caution.
He cited interference by France and Germany in managing the eurozone debt crisis as the reason fore his decision.
Yums.
After the concert, we met up with Christie, Tammy and Greg and Andi for a beer in the P&L courtyard. We didn't stay too long though. I was starving, so we headed to Town Topic for some greasy food. I have always wanted to go there, especially after Anthony Bourdain featured it on No Reservations a few weeks back.
I can not communicate
Reason #4: I find it fascinating to look at a person (real or imagined) and examine all the things they’ve been through in life that have shaped them into the person they are right now. That must be why I love origin stories and prequels. With YA characters, that process is still happening.
The construction punch and back check has been a time consuming and often frustrating process causing delays and embarrassment. Tablet PCs and mobile devices can make this faster and smoother. The Bluebeam Punch process is visual, mobile and easy with options to add photos to clarify the exact issue the inspector wants addressed, improving communication and eliminating confusion.
Book Three: That Hideous Strength
And with any luck, I'll have MORE goodies to list very soon! If the sun keeps shining and the interruptions stay minimal, and if I can keep myself motivated as I should be, I'll be blazin' through my upcoming projects and filling up my store at record speed over the next several months. Seems like the economy is slowly but surely picking up again (as are my sales!), the days are getting longer, the flowers are starting to make their appearance, and all is right with the world. So this old gal has, really, no excuse!
In Regard to the Likelihood of a Pension Reform Bill Next Week
This past week we were focusing on instruction. We started by skimming two of my favorite Carol Ann Tomlinson articles on differentiation. (Instructor hope: they will read more when they have time.)
Okay, that's it for now. I just wanted to check in. I have tons to write up--I just need to carve out some time. And please know I love you all, and I'm not trying to go all invisible woman or anything--it's just hectic right now.
Robert Leo (Bobby) Hackett nació el 31 de enero de 1915 en Providence, Rhode Island, el sexto de nueve hijos de una familia con escasos recursos económicos. Muy pronto empezó a tocar el ukelele y con 12 años ya tocaba la guitarra y el violín y se había comprado su primera corneta. Con 14 años dejó la escuela secundaria para ayudar a su familia, teniendo su primer trabajo fijo con una banda que tocaba en un restaurante chino. También tocaba la guitarra con regularidad en los salones de baile Rhodes y Arcadia, en sesiones que a menudo se emitían en la radio de Providence.
And lastly, let's not forget the "Keep Calm & Carry On" trend! I have seen numerous ideas using the "Keep Calm" phrase, and I am in love with this "Keep Calm & Teach On" altered frame! It's a great reminder for teachers, especially on those hectic and crazy days (trust me, I teach 2 and 3-year-olds...I could use this reminder daily! LOL)
For all of its absurdities and off-kilter sense of humour, however, the novel is very much rooted to its time and place by the event that looms in the background of the story from the very beginning, that of the assassination of John F Kennedy in Dallas. That event doesn’t fully escape the gravitational pull of the novel’s absurd tone - Shushan Cats is a long-time friend of Jack Ruby; at one point, Cats, a former crack marksman with the Marines, is considered a suspect for the assassination - but there is a pervasive sense that the killing of JFK, for all the man’s personal faults (to which Shushan testifies at every opportunity), marks something of a watershed in modern American history; that America took a turn for the worse on that fateful date in November 1963.
of those clouds,
My meditation techniques have changed over the years, too. In the last 10 years I've been to a number of different classes and conferences on consciousness and mindful meditation. Everyone has to work out the best meditation program for themselves, but I have found it to be very helpful to me as I have gone through this journey with MDS, the bone marrow transplant and MDS again. There are all kinds of tools to help you so that you don't have to do it on your own. I find sound technology, particularly that used by The Monroe Institute, to be helpful to me.
Can you tell them your name? I prod her. She shrugs. I look at her. Then she replies in her most heavily accented "G**********" ever. Then I ask her which nickname she prefers, Khubz or Khubzita. "KhubzITA" she offers, also in her best accent.
Both my broken wings,
A reasonably catchy “Introduction to Anarchism” via Religion, Royalty and Margaret
Ladies, if you truly love your husband, then this is the time to get him a second wife. Allow him not just to marry but get out of your way and give him your sister or cousin or best girlfriend. Jealousy shows a selfishness and lack of true love for your partner. A generous woman holds the family together and shares her man’s love with other women.
( Insert mental picture of ugly brown kitchen with cracked knobs, covered in sand since I cant find my "before" picture)
Feeling seriously chilled now, even though the car isn't packed.
I would never ask anyone to support me blindly, but if anyone finds Authonomy useful and checks out my book, I can always use more support. BTW, it actually doesn't help a book if you support it immediately upon joining. You need to add some books that don't mean much to you (or other ones you find that are good) and first get a ranking before adding the books you truly like to your shelf. Only with a ranking will books accrue benefit from your support. The longer you leave them on your shelf, the more points they gain.
goodness.
Today, much like the day of her birth, we have leaden grey skies and downpours of rain. the world outside is damp and soggy and uninviting, but inside it is bright and vibrant and colourful as her love of life shines through.
And not that it was really that bad. But it wasn’t like they were calling me to tell me “We just wanted to let you know that your skin is PERFECT! The most perfect we have ever seen! And below the surface? You are made completely of angel dust and gold sparkles!”
Shield yourself
If you need to cancel your attendance for any reason, we will not be able to refund your payment unless we have a waiting list.
And has a nature so malign and ruthless,
“Supposing truth is a woman – what then?” writes Nietzsche in the Preface to Beyond Good and Evil, and in Antichrist Von Trier eagerly sets his talents to answering this question. The movie begins with a prologue, filmed in slow-motion black and white, and set to Handel’s “Let Me Weep.” In this prologue, the film’s two nameless protagonists, “He” (Willem Dafoe) and “She,” (Charlotte Gainsbourg) are having sex. In their passion, they are lost to the world around them; so much so that they are unaware that their young child has observed them (in what Freud referred to as the “primal scene”) and subsequently has fallen out of an open window to his death onto the sidewalk below. This opening sequence is shamelessly shocking in how it contrasts the innocence of a child with explicit shots of an erect penis thrusting into a vagina. The connection between the two is obvious – children are the product of sexual union between men and women – but still, we desire to obscure this truth. The child in the film has no knowledge of the primal sexuality of which he is the product, and we ourselves think it indecent to be reminded of this fact of nature. But that does not make it any less true. Nor does the horror we feel upon watching this child fall to his death make the reality of human mortality any less true. Everyone who is born is the product of physical lust and is destined to die. In this short, awful prologue then, Von Trier has compressed the entire trajectory of human existence.
Here is the front of the card. You can see several layers there, all made using different dies. The basic shape of the card is made using the largest of the mini pearl rectangle mega doily to get this cute little scalloped effect all around the card. I then flipped it in 3 using the scoreboard from Diamondcardcraft.
This infinity in the Expanded HERE and NOW is the Eye of the Storm, the centerpoint of our Heart’s Knowingness. Being there enables us to see everyone’s point of view at the same time. It gives us the compassion to see beyond the limiting definitions of duality. And it sets us free of duality based perceptions.
The day came. Every one Hina asked came on time. Every one was anxious and restless to know what was to come next. Some came to hear what Hina had to say. Some came out of curiosity. Hina lay weak and frail on her bed. There was pin drop silence in the room. Every ear waited impatiently for Hina to speak.
-Glue Sticks
November 9
There is a world of opportunity out there, it starts within, within you my friend. Be grand!
Bolívar returned to Venezuela in 1811.
Then there were the desserts! A tray of assorted Italian cookies (my favorite!), along with homemade funfetti-dipped strawberries (yes, you heard that right–funfetti strawberries! They were dipped in white chocolate with the funfetti sprinkles in it), colorful cupcakes with hearts and fruit. Unfortunately, the desserts were snatched up too quickly for me to get a picture! Anyone who knows me knows how much I love chocolate-covered strawberries, so I had to try one of the funfetti variety (even though I’m not a big funfetti fan.) I also had a cupcake–chocolate, how could I not??–and WAY too many cookies. (Lesson learned: don’t sit down right next to the cookie tray. Ever.)
We will randomly choose one commenter from this month's posts to win this prize!
Anyway, I did end up breaking her water since she didn't change after a couple hours had gone by. I told her I would come back in a couple hours to re-check her and she should get some rest. The patient says to me "I'd like to see more of you and less of her (Nurse Crappy)". What I wanted to say - "Well, we can stop the epidural and I will spend lots more time in here with you, but in the meantime I have a patient going natural who I am spending my time with." In reality I just smiled and told her I would try to get her another nurse. Which didn't happen as the board was full and everyone was loaded up.
For Cora, New York holds the promise of discovery that might prove an answer to the question at the center of her being, and even as she does her best to watch over Louise in a strange and bustling city, she embarks on her own mission. And while what she finds isn’t what she anticipated, it liberates her in a way she could not have imagined. Over the course of the summer, Cora’s eyes are opened to the promise of the twentieth century and a new understanding of the possibilities for being fully alive."
This is a Wee Heavy that one of our brewers has been working on for a couple of years and the final results are well worth the wait.
One might ask, “Why wasn’t 17-year-old Trayvon in school on the day he was shot?” He was on suspension after having been caught with a marijuana pipe and baggie with drug residue. In fact, this was Trayvon’s third suspension. The first was a result of tardiness and truancy. The second is pretty dodgy. Last October, Trayvon was observed through surveillance cameras vandalizing school property. When a school official searched his bag for the graffiti marker, they discovered a large screwdriver and a bag containing twelve pieces of women’s jewelry including silver wedding bands and earrings with diamonds. When asked about the contents, of course, they did not belong to him, and were only given to him by an unnamed friend (maybe you have to have worked in law enforcement to appreciate the humor in this). The most recent reports are concerned with whether or not Trayvon attacked a bus driver.
“Stop waiting for someone to come along and help you out. Pursue what God has for you. Trust God!”
Breaking Beautiful is the perfect blend of heartbreak and triumph told through the eyes of a girl trying to find the pieces of her life to pick up. Sprinkling details of an abusive relationship between the stitches of what is left of Allie's normal life brings just the right amount of drama to this beautifully crafted story.
NOVELLA
These next four figures come from set RAF02808 SWAT Grunts. At the far left is a trooper with a 12 gauge Benelli M1 Pump-Action Shotgun. Note the pistol grip under the slide. His 9mm Glock 19 Pistol is holstered high on his right hip.
5. I am a rabid fan of the following shows on TV: Mad Men, Pan Am, Revenge, Downton Abbey, Ghost Hunters, Community, Parks and Recreation, The Office, and 30 Rock.
The Center, as well as the Els for Autism Golf Challenge, is being spearheaded by Els, whose son, Ben, was diagnosed with autism more than four years ago. The 2011 Golf Challenge was a huge success thanks to Els’ long-time golf sponsors SAP, RBC and Callaway Golf. Els for Autism expects 2012 to be an even bigger year, with SAP leading the charge as Presenting Sponsor and RBC, Callaway Golf, Wine Spectator and new sponsor Trumpet Behavioral Health providing strong support as well as actively helping to form teams for the Golf Challenge.
Our water consumption has dropped from an average of 18 cubic meters per month to about 9 cubic meters per month. I was skeptical low flow toilets and taps could actually make a difference but I guess I am wrong. I am interested to see if there is a noticeable drop when we get around to purchasing a high efficiency washing machine. I know there would be a drastic drop if Dave would give up his epically long baths.
We put away our harps,
Though the treasures Christ offers are innumerable, consider just five of these transactions He asks you to make. There is nothing in this world worth clinging to in light of His offers!
Yesterday we were eating some delicious watermelon. I truly believe that this is the most delicious watermelon I've ever tasted. It's totally ironic because when I was little you would of never caught me eating watermelon. I don't know what happen that made me change my mind hehe. =P
I distressed the designer paper with a sponge dauber and Navy ink from A*Muse Studio.
Haiga ~ image with haiku as one work.
‘Who’s Carl?’ I ask.
Ninety-one thousand Americans are deployed under President Barack Obama’s orders to surge forces to the region. Despite ample evidence to the contrary, some Americans are convinced that strategy is a failure. Such perceptions undercut our troops, undercut their commanders and embolden the enemies who target them every day.
So, this Banner is kind-hearted, but when issues of anger-management or past sins arise, we see his facial muscles tighten and eyes focus. We see that this is a man of great resources and personal strength. He is a man of self control.
Favourite Quotes
77. The Bangles-Sweetheart Of The Sun (Down Kiddie)
T to the JOY
So quiet down cobwebs; Dust go to sleep!
I have continued to go back to Alisha's blog and I have to say that she is F-U-N-N-Y!!! I love how she makes me laugh with her stories, from her bet with friends to compete in their own Biggest Loser competition, taking out a big snake on the porch (boots and all) to stories from her new job (you have to read it to believe it....and she is living it) she will have you snorting in laughter!
How much do want to bet that when the excrement impacts against the spinning blades of doom, Detroit big-wigs will be the first pigs muscling up to the federal trough squealing for a bail-out?
When chops have rested, add any accumulated juices to skillet and set over medium heat. Simmer, whisking constantly, until glaze is thick and color of dark caramel (heatproof spatula should leave wide trail when dragged through glaze), 2 to 6 minutes.
One day a stranger came to town and
“Oh, so you had this all planned!” Suzanne remarked.
In Autumn, the trees start to change and the air get’s gusty! The rusty burnt colours of the trees and the crispy freshness of the air, mmm, I can smell it already! I really am obsessed!
Over time, the lure of a different place untouched by Western consumerism and individualism, was losing its exotic veneer : family members told stories of occasional breathing problems in polluted, humid Bangkok or Beijing, nearly blind consumer worship of McDonald’s, Louis Vitton and cars sweeping across at least, urban Asia, or news reports on gross occupational hazards where locals died or were injured while labouring under dangerous conditions.
While our heat was out and we were using the fireplace I managed to either pull or sprain a muscle in my side. Painful! I used the heating pad every chance I got and I know everyone got tired of listening to my low moans and sudden yelps of pain. I was not able to do anything, even stitching, because any type of movement seemed to set off another pain and scream!
Next witness.
Cherry Mojitos (see picture below)
It makes me so sad to think about those kids who probably just wanted to go about their lives, and get through the high school with the least amount of friction, just like the rest of us. How they were threatened and tormented, and taunted until they couldn’t take it anymore.
I'm not sure when it finally sunk in that this was no joke. One of my closest friends in the entire world was gone. I would never see her again, or hear her voice and her laughter. I spent most of the night crying, and didn't sleep for a single minute. I'm filled with happy memories, but also regrets.
that these colours will ever be so so
Also included are two student films, The Tram (1966), about a boy flirting with a pretty girl, and The Face (1966), where he played a tormented artist.
Usually, I'm all for breaking the rules when it comes to writing. But the point of a drabble, as originally conceived, is to write something self-contained in just a hundred words.
I suppose where women are routinely pushed (cornered?) into having
If we sight naught but seas at dawn?”
And specious stuff that says No rational being
Tris continues to grow and develop in Insurgent and has became one of my new favorite YA heroines! She was crafted perfectly! Along with Four, who we learn more about and who also develops a lot more, plus a villain that you will love to hate!
A simple vase of flowers makes such a difference to a room, draws the eye... other simple things can have the same effect.
Because, honestly..
Not enjoyment, and not sorrow,
At the end of the season, we let what was left of the air out of the ring and removed the pump and hoses. We left the pool in the sunken area created specifically for the pool. The pool now has about two or so inches of water in it. This water is not clean. It has algae growth and various insect larvae, along with grass thrown by the lawn mower.
In this jurisdiction, it is illegal to park a vehicle in the front yard of any residential property, including your own. This might seem like a violation of personal rights to some, but it isn’t nearly as oppressive as some of the requirements I’ve seen put forth by homeowners’ associations. Anyway, I’m not certain, but I believe this city has this law in place as another way to help protect property values. As you might imagine, this causes its fair share of parking tickets among the unaware.
stalking. Specific intent stalking statutes may be more difficult to prosecute.
ME: What? Is this a recording???!!
This ladies chronograph is a true Grand Complication that projects feminine elegance despite the extreme micromechanical complexity of its inner life.
1-12 Voices 4:52
We will be in the computer lab, C07.
I woke up at 2:46 am. The night nurse was in our room. She was doing CPR. On Sawyer. She was saying over and over again, “The baby is not breathing.” I could not comprehend what was happening. One year and 1 month later I still do not understand. I doubt I ever will.
Shabab fighters still control large parts of central and southern Somalia but are facing increasing pressure from regional forces, with Kenya in the far south, Ethiopia in the south and west, and African Union troops in Mogadishu.
She made me feel all maternal, and when her mum was fighting with her sisters, she was holding my finger while I made sure she was quiet and was okay. I even stroked her head to help soothe her.
Happy to say she loved it. It's been 2 days since her birthday and I believe she is still celebrating, you go girl!
This year’s rise in global stock markets is mostly the natural side effect of the massive, unprecedented money-printing by the world’s four most-powerful central banks.
Who is John Dee? I’m glad you asked! Now for the bio (ahem): “John Dee (13 July 1527–1608 or 1609) was an English mathematician, astronomer, astrologer, occultist, navigator and consultant to Queen Elizabeth I. He devoted much of his life to the study of alchemy, divination and Hermetic philosophy. In his lifetime Dee amassed one of the largest libraries in England. His high status as a scholar also allowed him to play a role in Elizabethan politics. He served as an occasional adviser and tutor to Elizabeth I and nurtured relationships with her ministers Francis Walsingham and William Cecil.”
Although entirely seasonal they are an important source of food, and income for many who live in the mopane belt – across southern Africa. They are low cost, and low maintenance – yet high protein. But as with so many other species in the food chain they are vulnerable to over-harvesting.
How long does it take for you to write a book? What's your process? How many revisions? How do you know when it's right to submit?
Not only is my local grocery store a fine purveyor of aural nostalgia, but I have since discovered a radio station, Oxigeno (102.1 on your FM dial), that dabbles in “Los Anos Ochenta” (that would be Spanish for “The Eighties”).
Sex roles are innate and un-changable.
Where does this leave us? It leaves us with much more to consider and prepare for. Life as we know it is changing and it is about to change beyond recognition. China does not want to get rid of the SA whites, China wants to get rid of the western influence in SA and hopefully all of Africa. It is a known fact that China has Africa in its sights, it wants Africa to be their next province, where they could shift their people to. This is becoming Chinese territory, territory they would be willing to defend. Africa consists of people China could control, because they know how and they have the means to do so. This is a "Screw the NWO, we have the Chinese" situation and we better deal with it. While the west / NWO like to control the minds of the people, the Chinese control the people, their behaviour, their likes and dislikes, their movement and everything about them.
i feel like i am stuck.
Sorry, Mom. I’m sure your hand will heal soon.
Today, as most of us know, is Palm Sunday.
6. We love getting to know you and so do our members. You'll participate in the forums by posting a minimum of 5 times a week.
Since the moment during my pregnancy that I stumbled upon cloth diapers my brain has been churning. I immediately began spreading the word about cloth to my friends, my family, my co-workers, my online diary community.... I crunched numbers, compared brands and types of cloth diapers and disposables. I researched the materials used in cloth vs the materials used in disposables. I was hooked, and I converted my fiance effortlessly.
MDMA is a synthetic, psychoactive drug that is chemically similar to the stimulant methamphetamine and the hallucinogen mescaline. It produces feelings of increased energy, euphoria, emotional warmth, and distortions in time, perception, and tactile experiences.
Baba was a fat man. Fifty-eight years of over-eating, smoking, not exercising, and generally not giving a fuck about his weight had made him seriously obese. His walk had become a lumbering waddle. Just moving from room to room robbed him of breath and forced him to sweat. His breathing rattled and wheezed, as if forced from a tired and over-taxed set of bellows. Gluttonous feasts of Turkish cuisine had kept him this way over the years, adding to his expanding girth and jowly face. But he didn’t care. He was rich. He was respected in his community.
***We do have one announcement we want to be sure you get!***
Do you have sales people who can clearly communicate with your customers and potential customers? Do they have market knowledge and data that is valuable? Are they highly trained professionals?
Christopher George, a friend of James Hataway went missing around the same time Tracy Ocasio did and his remains were believed to be found in Apopka
According to Mayor Franz Meindl, there is no brewery in Fucking. The brand's creators, Stefan Fellenberg and Florian Krause accused the EU patent office of having a dirty mind when it initially had rejected the brand for profanity. But when they provided The Trade Marks and Designs Registration Office of the European Union with their linguistic explanation, the Office okayed the trademark and said, "The word combination claimed contains no semantic indication that could refer to a certain person or group of persons. Nor does it incite a particular act. It cannot even be understood as an instruction that the reader should go to hell. Nor can it be considered as reprehensible to use existing place names in a targeted manner (as a reference to the place), merely because this may have an ambiguous meaning in other languages."
nutrition facts (Pumpkin, Chickpea, and Red Lentil Stew)
PPPS – if you have any theme ideas you want to read about let me know below!
NOT BEFORE! (it is no joke, it is called "cenesthetic hallucination")
There is prima facie evidence presented here to suggest that what is at stake in the seemingly never-ending EU-contagion-global-collapse scenario is not real damage to citizens, social structures or even sovereign success as a trading concern. Rather, the game is one of globalophiles and banking firms terrifying the crap out of everyone such that a precedent is not set: ‘there must be no forgiveness, no welching, and no deviation – otherwise they will see that chicken-licken was wrong’.
“What are you d-“
Japan’s real gross domestic product contracted 0.8% during the month of March, swinging from growth in February, according to research cited in a Nikkei business daily report.
and the architecture turned symphonic
I had a dream last night. It was one of those incredibly vivid and detailed dreams, the kind where you wake up and feel like you were really there.
Now I was so rained on hard! Before i could even find a place to buy an umbrella, my white me was soaked and all dirty up to the ankles, great!!
I'm really hoping I can make it. Lord RC has graciously offered me the chance to give a lecture. If it's early in August, I can make it before the Fall semester begins, but we're not exactly swimming in bread over here at TDH, far from it. My options are fairly limited and may involve camping on someone's floor. But, somehow, that feels right. And I have a good feeling about this.
Many miles away but our eyes unite on one star
12. Too Late For The Sun
It has long been my habit to collect and update data on all manner of issues and topics. In this era of Google and Bing, that may seem outdated, but it has its uses and, anyway, habits are hard to break.
The Smoke Free Work Place Act is a costly failed social experiment in micro-managing the private sector, and specifically the hospitality and leisure industries. It should never have been allowed to proceed beyond the certification process for lack of credible “evidence” that the law as proposed was ever necessary to begin with. The allegations of fraud and contested procedural methods employed to achieve its passage should be evidence enough of it’s highly questionable necessity or of the validity of claims made to solicit signatures for it’s approval and placement on the ballot.
This month, I submitted my thesis proposal. I won't have my Master's by 25, but I'll have it 3 months after I turn 25. I'll take it. I think I'm going to extend my deadline the way health insurance companies extend your health care.
Hawaii for 1 week, then 1 week in Las Vegas,
CassaStar was just the beginning…
If I had to go all macro on you, I'd say that too many people have been brought up who are constantly seeking praise. From childhood--when they needed to see their drawings hung on the refrigerator till today when they need to see their work gushed over.
Embossing: Boofle Folder
For some reason, I have a feeling that I will be married in the next four years.
So that little speed bump aside, here’s what I’ve come up with… Sort of with some help from the interweb.
53 no
Around and around the rink I went with Jack gripping my hand and I wondered how many times I have circled that rink and if I held my mom's hand the first time I went around. Because it's been a long time and I don't remember anymore.
lights turned on then
Cabinets for 80% Less: New cabinets can range from $5,000-$20,000. Instead of buying new cabinets, paint or reface your existing cabinets; install new hardware for an instant update.
I feel motherhood on a cellular level and every child is mine. The thought 'that could be Max' floats through my brain almost daily on hearing of any tragedy befalling a child.
Have a wonderful day! Tammie
It is my hope and the subject of my weak prayers that similar forces that made us choose civilization over continuing with the hunter-gatherer lifestyle will make us look beyond our narrow and tired concerns. Excuse my semi-intelligent rant but every now and them something comes along that, at least to me, gives a real hint at the true scope of existence. Special thanks to Nance over at “Mature Landscaping” for bringing my attention to this remarkable video.
Peeking on street style is one of the most fun parts during fashion week.
Could I sleep? No, not really. I sat up for an hour or two, going over the timeline of events for the next day. I triple checked our guest list and escort cards and I went over the vows one last time before retiring to my bed. At that point, I attempted to quiet all of the little nagging voices I was hearing in my head in order to get some beauty sleep. However, I was like a kid trying to get to sleep before Christmas...I was just so excited for the next day!
Stolik opened his mouth to reply, but was cut off by the piercing sob of the guide, who was now hurriedly pouring salt all around himself. He kept muttering ‘eretnik, eretnik.’ What did that mean? Heretic? Was this some kind of religious nonsense among Jews?
1 driven
I walked to the edge of the roof. I said, “look at my wings, aren’t they beautiful?”
Secondly, does anyone know how to stop following a blog? I tried to figure it out, but can't seem to make any changes. I have decided if I am not inspired, uplifted, connected by friendship... maybe it's time to stop following. Especially if there are things that I find uncomfortable. Everyone has the right to post about anything they want, and rather than complain or rant in their comments (which I find that a lot of people do), I'd rather just quietly slip away. If you know how to do this, please let me know. I just can't seem to find the right "button" or place to do this.
I'll never understand why so many seemingly intelligent folks are more offended by the beauty of the human body than by the horror of body bags. Why are breasts and buttocks celebrated in the glorious artwork of the Greeks and Romans (yes, even in the Vatican) but draped and hidden in the U.S?
With the option to use ANY pen in the Gazelle, I put a standard purple ballpoint pen in the blade holder. I then "cut" the sentiment "Happy Mother's Day" in the true type font BlackJack.
At one point in 1996, Youngblood traveled by bus to Windhoek, Namibia, for a week-long break. The trip involved a long stopover in Johannesburg where he would catch a bus to take him across South Africa’s Transvaal region (great plains). With the University of the Witwatersrand a short walk from the bus rank in downtown Johannesburg, Youngblood said that “curiosity got the better of me.” Upon exploring the chemistry department, he came across a flyer for an IUPAC conference on chemistry and the environment that grabbed his attention.
His arm that was around me went limp. He offered then to take me home. Once he drove me home, I gave him one last hug and went into the house.
19. When Davies collected his OBE, he asked Prince Charles, “Are those ears real?”
All professionals in the field of psychiatry who dealt with Breivik on a daily basis ridiculed the first report except those who wrote it.
3) Hypnos 69 - Legacy
Meanwhile, I move my spastic-ness to the living room couch and try to settle in there. There’s no point in keeping my hubby up as well. Our dog – an elderly Golden Retriever with a lapdog mentality, tries to jump on the couch next to me. I scold her. She slurps me with a kiss to the face anyway, because, honestly, Golden Retrievers don’t know any other way to react except with love. I could learn a lot from my dog.
what is to be done??!!
This is not actually an advertising story. But, in honor of the Academy Awards, it is the true story of one of the most successful movies in history.
Wikipedia also notes the Congressman’s substantial philanthropic work in education and that Rep. Polis is a notable milestone for minority politics in that he “is the first openly gay man elected to the House as a freshman and the first gay parent in Congress.”
"Dare to dream"
The Destroyer's origin is unknown, though Morgaine talks about summoning him from fire and implies that he came from Hell.
Best Website
Portland feels like one huge gentrified neighborhood. Or at least a collection of several gentrified neighborhoods together. It’s not only the lack of racial, ethnic, and cultural diversity that I’m speaking of; there is also just this general feel that everywhere in Portland is pretty much nice. Housing prices are fairly even across the city, and no matter which neighborhood you’re in you can find great strips of nice boutique shops, great places to eat, and a yoga studio.
this stinks...
(b) enough to pay preferred creditors, such as employees with unpaid wages though this figure will be small and may in fact be zero;
Then again, there was no cut announced between the figures of 1.1 million square feet and 908,144 square feet, so maybe there's some slack in the building program that was never explained.
The most significant aspect of these proposals is the grant of a right to a landowner/proponent to seek a review of Council’s decision to not proceed with a planning proposal (see further below).
Each returned gift should be accompanied by a personal note stating why you are returning the item to the gift giver (ex: you’ve separated).
I thought he would do that again. But instead of getting woken up a bunch of times, I woke up when my alarm went off at 6:30. I bolted out of bed, my first thought being what the heck had the boy been up to for the last 2 and a half hours!
“You get artists in this position who go crazy and don’t know how to handle it. There are people who have killed themselves. There’s the overwhelming stress, how tired you are, the weight on your shoulders of going out there and giving 18,000 people entertainment… it’s a lot of pressure.
platter of delicious finger sandwiches and rushing, I put together
“That’s OK, baby. You said the end of the week anyway.”
Now I just have to sit back with fingers crossed, hoping we do not have to cancel because of my dad's medical issues. And cheaper airfare....that would be nice too!
-$1/1 mq 10.31.10 P&G
1. (a) Define convolution . State and prove time the frequency convolution.
HAMUUL: No. You don’t understand. I know.
I know how it is. You're not going to click on every one of those just to find out how ridiculous I really am. But at least click on the second to last one. Trust me. Then you can wonder along with me how something like that was EVER cool.
When I told the story yesterday, it was recalling the very first time that I had encountered someone who definitely was not going to be appeased until she had the information about our family that she deemed necessary.
7) For the premiere of Pinocchio Walt hired 11 midgets, dressed them up like the little puppet and put them on top of Radio City Music Hall in New York with a full day’s supply of food and wine. The idea was they would wave hello to the little children entering into the theater. By the middle of the hot afternoon, there were 11 drunken naked midgets running around the top of the marquee, screaming obscenities at the crowd below. The most embarrassed people were the police who had to climb up ladders and take the little fellows off in pillowcases.
1) Move through the store in an orderly fashion. Shop by section or area, moving from front to back and side to side. There are lots of hidden treasures that you don't want to miss!
- Nothing deep fried (taquitos, chimichanga, etc)
You pledged allegiance to your flag all through school. You should know what it means, now, even if you were forced to do it in school. Allegiance to the flag does not mean allegiance to a government that can’t seem to pull its head out of its ass and do the right thing. Allegiance to your flag means allegiance to the liberties that the flag stands for, the freedoms as outlined by the United States Constitution and Bill of Rights.
Mark USA in blue.
My identity
11. A donkey can sink into quicksand but a mule can’t.
I wish I could bring you all along. But alas there can only be one winner (who I had to pick at random because it was far too difficult to choose!).
The information listed below is a smattering of information gained from real life experience, Wilderness Medicine Conferences, and is mostly credited to Gene Allred, MD a very experienced physician and world traveler.
never mind the traps we always set–
My day felt a little off today because I took off of work on Friday. If you are a teacher, you understand the disarray you can come back to after a sub, even if the sub is great, the lesson plans go accordingly, and the kids behave. When I first started teaching, I would think about school the whole day; I would even call or email teacher-friends to check in on my room. Now I am able to let go and trust that everything will be fine.
As promised, I have a Murrini Monday post! It's been a while, so let's get right to it. Murrini for this edition of Murrini Monday is brought to you by Lori and Kim.
31. Bowling
SCR: Single Check Rebate. Rite Aid’s monthly rewards programs. Unlike Walgreens RR and CVS ECB, which reward you with each applicable transaction, the SCR is a monthly reward. You enter information from your receipts online, and they mail you a rewards check for the appropriate amount for the past month. These can be cashed or deposited like any other check. Kind of reminds me of a mail-in rebate, but you need not mail receipts or UPCs.
*Update: This giveaway has ended.
He’s hanging on to it, but Ronnie has his hips up to defend it and keep the pressure off of his neck.
This is the makeup and charge of Guomo’s newly appointed education commission that includes a banker, a businessmen, a lawyer, two politicians, and an educator thrown in for good measure.
The trio's Myspace bio stresses that with it's über-slick production, Housebreaking failed to serve SYI justice stacked up against their live performances, which from the sound of it were plenty potent. Sonically, the record's rich, state-of-the-art sound is still a pleasure to listen to, and perhaps even edgier that I'm leading on, but the songwriting is woefully deficient. Despite receiving lyrical input from all three Insects, many, if not a full half of the cuts dotting Housebreaking's landscape are demonstrably underwritten and/or laden with half baked ideas that had yet to fully gestate. One egregious example is "I Want Cake," which for most lesser bands wouldn't even qualify as a b-side. In it's entirety, Housebreaking is still an impressive listen, just a bit frustrating in the lyrical department. To my knowledge there are at least three SYI singles floating around out there (which I'd love to hear along with any unreleased studio material), and the group's Myspace page has five additional cuts (some live) that can be streamed. If anyone cares to chime in about the Insects, comment as you see fit. A big shout out goes to George for sending me these files.
flat fried eggs
As this is a process that builds on itself, be sure to have completed steps 1-4 before heading into this step. The insights you have gained over the past four steps have prepared you for this next step in the process of understanding the truth about you.
Added a little polymer clay hat and a bit of vintage lace. .I know
Part of my business plan includes promotion, for writers today one of the most effective ways to promote is to build a platform. Quite simply, this is just the space where you market yourself. If your platform is effective it can help guide readers to your books and generate sales.
"The Rand experiment: don't prevaricate—participate
The only thing that I wanted was more time in the day. That, unfortunately, is not something the blogging challenge hosts can do anything about. For the rest, I commend you all for a great and well planned challenge.
And lo and behold, I find myself on the set of modern-day Mad Men. People in the metro, on the streets, even in class all have this austere, tortured look to their wardrobe as if their personal and professional lives are spent on the defendant’s bench.
The problem with young people today is that they’re too materialistic.
All of you please contact Please contact Michelle to claim your free digital image. Please allow a free days for a reply as it is Christmas and I know she is busy having fun with her family.
As the outside frame size measures about 21"x27", the squares don't allow for including everyone's work schedules so we can nagivate through the week.
His cancer spread much quicker than the doctors had anticipated and he deteriorated rapidly within just a few days. We knew he was suffering. And we couldn't bear to see him in pain. His furry brothers knew that his time was limited. They spent his last few days by his side, licking his face, rubbing against his body and keeping him company.
Earlier this week, I turned on one of my favorite TV financial shows and there was Barnes & Noble’s CEO announcing that Microsoft had purchased 17.5% of Barnes & Noble. Their stock immediately rose by 10%. I’m posting some links at the end of the blog to articles about the deal.
Topic - My goal to be a size 12 by Christmas
Note to our readers: We always welcome you to forward and share the forecasts. However if you are re-publishing any part of them please make sure to post the author, source and contact info (written by Lena Stevens of The Power Path www.thepowerpath.com) or provide a link. We very much appreciate it. If you do come across the forecasts re-published without this information please let us know.
Well, just to give ya a lil background info into this post...
Rising carbon dioxide will have a negligible effect on the climate but will make green plants, including forests and crops, grow better. It will benefit our planet.
MEMORABLE QUOTE: "Christmas is a very busy time for us, Mr. Cratchit. People preparing feasts, giving parties, spending the mortgage money on frivolities. One might say that December is the foreclosure season. Harvest time for the money-lenders."
This skirt was pretty painful to complete, but I’m learning. The belt was a little short, so next time I’m going to leave some extra fabric when I’m cutting it. I started labeling all of the panels with chalk listing what direction the pattern was when I cut it. That seemed to help make things go more smoothly, but it still got tricky in parts.
She spent half the afternoon yesterday playing with her, and the other half playing with the doll's virtual twin on InnerStarU.com. (I swear she's almost more excited about the computer games than the doll itself.) Then at bedtime, I created this quick and easy bed out of the AG box. I simply wrapped some scrap fabric around a folded batting to create the mattress, and then cut out some scrap fleece for a blanket. She and A's (My Generation) doll were all tucked in for the night.
Last point, for my money Peggy Noonan, David Gergen (despite what you think of them now) and Peter Robinson wrote some really terrific stuff for President Regan. President Regan, it should be noted, added all the right points at all the key inflections within the speech to make his words eternal.
“Smart enough.”, I smiled back. It might just have been the ambiance, but i felt good somehow.
Luv Ya,
As to farming matters - for weeks it has been so dry that there has been no point in putting fertiliser on the grass as it would just sit on the surface - the ground was like concrete. Now, after days of heavy rain, the reverse is true. Luckily, in the interim period the farmer got his fertiliser spread. Now it is the rolling that is waiting to be done and the ground is too wet. I don't suppose there is ever a perfect year for weather as far as farming is concerned and farmers through the ages have learned to take what comes, which is one of the farmer's favourite expressions.
And indignity
I'm getting organised now with my cards for Christmas. Nearly finished my orders just need to make a couple of cards for myself then I'm all done! Christmas shopping though that it is another matter! I've bought one present so far! Note to self - must get organised!!!!
Student : Sir, you are working on the premise of duality. You argue there is life and then there is death, a good GOD and a bad GOD. You are viewing the concept of GOD as something finite, something we can measure. Sir, Science can’t even explain a thought. It uses electricity and magnetism, but has never seen, much less fully understood either one. To view death as the opposite of life is to be ignorant of the fact that death cannot exist as a substantive thing.
The capital city of my blood
Philippians 2:5-11
As the blues gained national attention, Rainey was one of the first African-Americans ever to record their singing. (The first known was Mamie Smith in 1920.) In 1923, she signed a contract with Paramount. In the space of six years she made over 100 records for the label, working with rising stars like Louis Armstrong. While recording, she continued to tour with Pa Rainey as well as the Wildcats Jazz Band led by black music pioneer Thomas Dorsey. Travelling throughout the South and Midwest, she performed for both black and white audiences.
Makers of the Influenza vaccine say it boasts a “solid health record,” meaning the shot does not seem cause observable illnesses. What is NEVER discussed, however, is the slow and gradual brain neuron degeneration most individuals go through, year after year, due constant mercury poisoning. This process of slowing down brain functions is not easily observable nor quantifiable but it is still happening on a world-wide scale. If mercury can completely disrupt the fragile minds of children enough to possibly cause autism, it will, at the very least, impair fully developed minds.
45 For even the Son of Man did not come to be served, but to serve, and to give his life as a ransom for many.”
We tend to think that man's progressed,
While the iPhone App Store offers more apps than the Android Market–about 425,000 versus 250,000 (as of July 2011)–overall selection isn’t the only factor. Apple is famously strict (some might say unpredictable) about what apps it allows and how it changes its policies, while Google’s standards for Android are somewhat more lax. Many developers have complained about the emphasis on free apps for Android and the difficulty of developing for so many different phones. As a result, not all of the best apps make it to Android, and those that do don’t necessarily run on all phones.
The association did persuade a judge to issue an eviction order for McCarn’s tenant and order a receiver appointed to manage the property.
As I thought about that title, the premise arose. What if someone could see things clairvoyantly in the images they develop in the darkroom? Things that the human eye could not see, but revealed things.Terrible things.
And with that, Day 013 was finished.
Anyway, I've come up with some tips on how to plan you perfect princess day. Of course you can alter them however you'd like ^^;
NOTE: This is an excerpt from the full 90-minute DVD.
Our Easter wish is that each of you have peace, joy, and HOPE.
I want to write about all the amazing tulips that have sprouted everywhere! Their colours are so rich and vibrant, I can practically feel my heart swelling inside my chest every time I see them.
I digress… How hard would it be to take a quick picture of each customer interfacing employee, write a quick history of them and your company, and turn it into a simple easy to email file? It is a simple idea that can completely alter the way your company is perceived.
By contrast, Wasp Star (Apple Venus Volume 2) is the most ordinary-sounding album of XTC’s career. This is the rock-oriented album Gregory would’ve preferred to make; unfortunately, Partridge and Moulding had to make it without him. Lacking Gregory’s guitar talents (Partridge handled all the guitar parts himself) or arranging skills, the album has few of the stylistic flourishes that distinguish XTC’s best work. Most of the songs on Wasp Star (...) are uninspired, revisiting fields that XTC has worked before with much more imagination and style”.
Here’s the exciting part! Zark’s Burger is probably one of my foodie dreams that just came true! HUGE BURGERS with REAL QUARTER POUND or HALF POUND PATTIES which will leave you full until the next day! No kidding! And the taste is incredibly wonderful! Just the flavor that was drilled into the thick patties is exceptional! Those patties are heaven, really! Like too much of a good thing! Am I exaggerating? Well, see for yourselves!
Step 2: Foaming
First, of course, you need to think about the overall style of the dress. Fuller figured women will wear different dresses from those with slimmer figures. This is just how the styles are made and doesn't mean anything bad about your figure at all. Dresses should aim to make you look more balanced and to play up your best features. Those who already have hourglass figures can pull of form fitting dresses. Women who need to bring a little more balance to their figures, though, may need to think through their dresses. For instance, you can make a bust look fuller with a draped front dress, and you can draw attention to a thin waist with a belt. Ruching around the waist is slimming on almost all figures.
as visions wide net is cast adrift, to wander
17 Big Hits (On The Underground)
We made a new plan and, while that is a whole other story, here we are.
One Bombay Sapphire and Fevertree tonic for me and Chefs requisite fizz of choice later and all earlier stresses were long forgotten.
Combine all ingredients in the food processor and process until a sticky mixture is formed. Roll the sticky mixture into 12-14 balls. Store in the refrigerator and enjoy!
Many people say the media gave us our current President.
The apparatus consists of a perforated cylinder, turning easily on bearings, and fitted above a fireplace enclosed in sheet iron, which is extended upwards, so as to form a chimney to carry away smoke, steam, or fumes. The cylinder holds one or two bushels of corn, and should be kept revolving steadily. There should be a low coke fire at first, and afterwards, as the steam passes away, a brighter one. In thirty minutes a fine aroma steals from the malt, which should be inspected five minutes later, by which time a good chocolate tinge ought to have been acquired. In forty minutes tho operation will be completed, and the charge may be turned out to mellow. Mr. Stopes also pointed out that slack pale malt may be more advantageously used in this way than by redrying it for ordinary use.
- Flag down the colectivo. Here, the buses stop if you are at the bus stop! How delightful!
If you saw the Tough Mudder article here, I wore these boots training in Ringwood Manor and on The Appalachian Trail.
But even the worst kind of confessions usually have some tincture of simple honesty. Is there nothing in A Journey, nothing that could be offered in mitigation? On reflection I suppose there is, though on further reflection I think the mitigation compounds the general offence.
Bella tells Lidia she's her best friend at least once an hour and it's music to my ears.
The laneway in the middle of the Ivy complex is buzzing. It's a balmy evening and there are plenty of happy people dining al fresco at Ash St Cellar and Felix bistro. Staff are happy for us to dine in for dessert, although we end up at an outdoor table, right next to the door that leads down to the bathrooms.
For instance, I have an idea that involves calculating the time between switches between the two characters you control. For a close comparison, think Sonic Heroes, but with two characters per level and the game actually encouraging switching without forcing it.
"There's been the usual crop of dumped hi-fi systems and scrapped Playstations," said Mike Goddard, at Belvoir, "but then comes the bizarre stuff – and every now and again we hear of a new surprise.
I might be a little tray crazy (and basket crazy) for that matter. I've never counted, but if I was forced to do so, I'm sure I could count at least 50 baskets and trays in our home. In my defense, things look tidier and more collected when contained on a tray or in a basket.
Sports & Outdoors Product Reviews Blog VWRQ (sportinggoodsvwrq.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Cheers to the cuisines of the Mediterranean….now onto finish my paper that is due tomorrow for my Mediterranean class.
154 6. Book Review: Sidney Lens, The Day Before Doomsday: An Anatomy of the Nuclear Arms Race (Garden City, New York, 1977). Chicago Sun-Times, Show/Book Week, June 26, 1977, p. 8. Reprinted in Hellenic Chronicle, Boston, Massachusetts, July 28, 1977, p. 5.
For those of you that have ever tasted Tiramisu it is made up of a very light and fluffy filling with a whipped cream topping and ladyfinger cakes. Personally the only kind I've ever tasted is from Olive Garden. I'm sure the traditional Italian, homemade version is much better, but hey, I don't live anywhere close to Italy, so Olive Garden will have to do.
Let us learn how to choose to forgive, as Jesus did on the cross, so that we can put the past behind us and allow the power of forgiveness to unlock our future. We don’t have to be a Christian to do this, but we have more reasons to forgive if we are.
In addition, Independence helps out other Austin non profits including Keep Austin Beautiful, It’s My Park Day, Friends of the Forest, Urban Roots and many animal rescue groups including Austin Pets Alive and Forgotten Friends.
Slowly add a 1/2 cup dry white wine and stir the veggies while scraping off brown bits from the frying pan into the mixture for flavor. Then add chicken broth and keep stirring the veggies around creating a nice sauce.
25 workers at $10 per day ($250 cost)
#10 - Heartbreaking Taunt
When I grew up, I thought I wanted nothing but success. I defined success the way normal people defined it— get a good job and lots and lots of money. I envied the grand houses that they showed on MTV Cribs. I dreamed of building a palace. This palace would have seventy-five rooms, an enormous movie theatre, five swimming pools, a forest instead of a garden, and a roller coaster that goes through the house. I realized that the only way to make this dream happen was to become a lawyer, a doctor, or a businesswoman. I suppressed my desires to become a writer and took up a management course in college.
45 min
Words in the Dust by Trent Reedy (Scholastic Inc., 2011). Zulaikha, a thirteen-year-old girl in Afghanistan, faces a series of frightening but exhilarating changes in her life as she defies her father and secretly meets with an old woman who teaches her to read, her older sister gets married, and American troops offer her surgery to fix her disfiguring cleft lip (Grade 6 & up).
Hold your loved one dear. Don’t make wrongful decisions that you’ll regret. Because once you begin regretting, you may try to swim against the current. And find yourself at the crossroads of foolishness and admirability.
5. The FOOD. Yes, Thai food is really awesome, I was very lucky to be there and able to enjoy it for 2 years. But talking about food made me miss Somtam+ our family hangout place, we went there almost 3 times a week that we became good friend with the owner, Roger (no picture of him either!). We order the same food every time we’re there, my mouth is now watering looking at this picture with all my favorite food on the table
and you have been very much missed.
“I don’t want to continue this,” he said. “I want to have rights, to at least be able to work at McDonald’s.”
♥ HIMEGYARU HAIR DEBUNKED ♥
Even if aboriginal tribes are allowed to survive as “primitive” peoples, this does not mean they will not engage in practices such as tribal warfare or sexual exploitation of children we “civilized” people will not find repugnant.
1) In which I am on my soapbox about shame Has shame ever helped a woman? This is just the other side of that same “You’re not enough” coin.
Let’s start with the casinos…why not? I’m the one running this blog, right? Well, mainly.
Here’s what it is:
While the barcode designs retain the functionality of a traditional barcode, their appearance has been altered to send a second message to it’s consumers. This is a fantastic opportunity to engage your audience with humor and an unexpected surprise and a fun way to enhance your brand’s identity.
ETA: I forgot to mention this earlier... the patterned paper and the lace are from Yvonne. I won a candy at her blog a few weeks back and she sent me a beautiful scrapbooking kit :-)
5. Odds; Taxes; Etc. Odds of winning a prize depend on the number and quality of eligible entries received. ALL FEDERAL, STATE AND LOCAL TAXES ASSOCIATED WITH THE RECEIPT OR USE OF ANY PRIZE ARE THE SOLE RESPONSIBILITY OF WINNER. All prizes will be awarded.The prize may be forfeited and awarded to an alternative winner if the winner affidavit and release materials (see Sections 10 and 11 below) are not returned as required from winner and guest or if two (2) attempts to contact winner by phone and/or e-mail are not successful, or if any prize is otherwise not claimed. Prizes are not transferable. No substitutions or exchanges (including for cash) of any prizes will be permitted, except that Sponsor reserves the right to substitute a prize of equal or greater value for any prize. Limit one prize per household or address. All prizes are awarded "AS IS" and WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, express or implied (including, without limitation, any implied warranty of merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose).
~Groucho Marx
Last Stand- Approved Cuts (One Way 1986)
Of course fate decreed that I didn’t need them. The nearest person to me as I arrived on the beach was Barry; a nice man and a great subject.
I was devastated as I had no real support. And the only professor with a kind heart was the life drawing teacher. But I didn't take from him and didn't know him. I had all the life drawing I needed already when I got there. He heard from one of the grad students what happened and tried to help but it was too late..I was undone.
C04 Drama Queen
After surpassing sales of over 162,000 copies of their breakout album BONE PALACE BALLET, CHIODOS is preparing to release a limited edition version of the album titled BONE PALACE BALLET: GRAND CODA October 28 (Equal Vision).
#092 Paul Lo Duca (Dodgers)
hiya chickies! yep ~ i've been dreaming of a 'green' christmas! looks like my wish is coming true. with only 2 more days left til christmas ~ and no white fluffy stuff in the forecast ~ i should be able to see those flowers still blooming outside when santa arrives!
But my favorites are the guys that like to make a boisterous production out of first seeing me in the hallway when I show up at their respective schools. It usually occurs early morning, when I am first noticed outside a classroom door during passing period, clipboard in hand. A guy will see me, from a room or more away, yell my name and something unintelligible and/or profane, then walk towards me, giving me his loud variation on my name; “MissssssTAHHH, Luuuckahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh….” giving me an enthusiastic fist-bump in passing, as the last ‘ahhhhh’ of my name fades away down the hall the other way with the kid.
I'm starting to come to terms with it. Beginning to accept that what I at first perceived as an inappropriate celebration, others may see as a sign of hope.
Better make them feel long instead of “a lot less”.
Look around your community and think
Beer America TV? I had never heard of this thing. Some of this is because I don't tend to watch video online much. But still! How has this escaped my attention? Anyway, birthday boy John Pinkerton and Paul Leone, whose background is in TV/video production, are the hosts, and most of the episodes are them drinking a beer and talking about it. They also do some "go to the brewers" interviews and such. It seems pretty cool: laid-back, with a brewer and a "regular guy" who like beer, talking beer. I can dig it.
to proceeding with a residential development. This is hardly a basis for the State to
Excuse me now. I'm going to go find my children and force them to snuggle me.
The Perfect Age of Rock ‘n’ Roll 2009 Hollywood Movie Watch Online : Vidreel Link : Alternative Link :
How McLaren defined nine days in the history of the Spanish Grand Prix
Who/what inspires you?
The Bug is doing well too. She's been crankier than usual but is still her fun self most of the time. I think the crankiness may have to do with her two-year molars. I don't feel anything cutting through the gums yet but I know they're hanging out in there just pushing, pushing, pushing. Today she fussed a lot in her sleep during her nap and I thought she was actually waking up. I went up to the bedroom to check on her but when I got there she stopped fussing, eyes still closed, relaxed, and fell the rest of the way back to sleep. But I noticed that her hands were both up by her face, near her jaw, when she was fussing and moving. Can't remember if I mentioned in my Easter post about smashing her finger in the shower door, but the nail finally fell off today. The new nail has only grown halfway out but she will not keep a band-aid on for longer than a few hours and there is only so much I can do. Today she tore the rest of the hanging part of the nail off the nail bed so I had to just cut it off, even though her finger looks very unprotected. Of course I put a band-aid on to help the finger heal more with some protection, but she kept it on for all of an hour. She's got another band-aid on tonight; at least that one should stay on until she wakes in the morning.
To top it all off, work has been exceptionally shit lately which I find tiring. Depressing, stressful and frustrating - These are three of the nicest words I can use to describe it. Ug. I don't even want to talk about it anymore.
The awful daring of a moment’s surrender
Sickos who do that kind of stuff to kids should be punished very severely.
Please pick your favorite and at the end of the day. I will tell you mine.
One thing that came across to me from the debates about blended whisky in the late 19th and early 20th centuries in the United Kingdom was that they were often not at all precious about what exactly constituted the grain component of the whisky. According to one side of the debate, all of the grain was a foreign substance.
Perry: By God, Rove, you are brilliant! This is why I have you as my Chief of Staff. But don’t think I don’t know all the god damn bullshit you said about me before the election. Let’s face it, Rove, we are both doing God’s work.
And was it just me, or was the whole Pegasus story much more interesting the first time around? And does he really need to be black? Come on... The original myth had Pegasus coming out of Medusa's neck hole after Perseus removes her head for her. How fucked up is that??
(I used the very thin asparagus, but if you use the more average size you will need to cook the asparagus for about 10-15 minutes longer)
same argument. Still, there’s a problem with that argument, because the responses Lloyd, Jensen, and other activists are promoting here have been standard across the spectrum of activist groups for more than three decades now, and that’s more than enough time to see how well they work. The answer? Well, let’s be charitable and say "not very well."
When the proofs, the figures, were ranged in columns before me;
No biggie – just move the strike around a little, or chisel out a little from behind it, and you’ll be good to go!:
Only a year before Barack Obama’s election, in perhaps the worst-titled book in recent times, A Bound Man: Why We Are Excited about Obama and Why He Can’t Win, conservative African-American intellectual Selby Steele argued that Obama could not win the presidency because he could not serve the aspirations of one race without betraying that of the other. Though the reasons for his victory are very complex, that Obama did win the nation’s highest office given the country’s racist past indicates that something new is in the air in racialist America.
One day.
Last week I was fortunate enough to have a sneaky peak at the work and I can report it's even more amazing in the flesh than it is in any book.
Congrats go to :
The time is just flying by so fast!!!
Still with PLR, but from a different angle today. The question this time is - can you maximise your PLR payments? I don't mean by visiting the sample libraries and borrowing your books, or even mobilising friends and family to do that. Borrowing books to raise PLR is a sad and desperate (and doomed) tactic that will cost more than it raises. No. I mean - to borrow a phrase from the Crabbit Old Bag of Help! I Need a Publisher - writing the right book at the right time in the right way to get as much PLR money as possible.
These are the people who are helping President Obama run our country. Obama once said, "Judge me by the people I asscociate with..." we do Barry, we do.
Or Maybe
My computer problems will be soon rectified. Thus, book reviews and other assorted posts will resume in due course.
It’s a funny thing, the vagina. As women, we’ve got this body part that is something so sacred to us, yet there are so many things that are such a mystery to us still, even after we’ve had periods and sex, and pregnancies and cramps and babies.
In the opening episodes there was a certain charm to the wacky high jinks, watching Bridget stumble her way through duplicity after duplicity that Siobhan had left in her wake, all while attempting to find out why Bridget-knowing menacing ethnic drug dealer Bodaway Macawi (whose name-spelling I refuse to Google one more time) or any other number of people were trying to kill her.
With a comment of “oh my” said around my nipple which was still between her teeth she resumed her sucking which was causing my cock to flop and pulse on her belly as she sucked . The sensation was of erotic teasing to the extreme. She was driving my arousal to such heights that it was difficult to breathe. I had an image in my mind of being a feather caught in the shifting breeze. The anguished pleasure emanating from my nipple caused me to drift listlessly in the air; I lilted from exquisite sensation to exquisite sensation, fluttering in pre orgasmic aroused euphoria. The erotic static electricity that was sparkling and tingling around my nipple was making my anus and cock throb and pulse.
I have made this skirt before and it is the style of skirt my mum alway said suited me best. The yoke is more flattering than gathers from the waist on my pear shape. Thanks Mum!
Happy Mapling! :)
do not sell this recording.
The first trailer for his documentary is out, ready to chap-your-ass and make your blood boil. Check it out below.
Anyway, I think I was the only one who like my 'beef stew' and ate more of it he he.
2. It is totally down to earth.
Winner will be notified by email and announced here, so be sure to include your email address!
Skeeter
- 1 clove garlic, pressed & minced
Let’s jump right in:
There are two main things that signify poorly used contemporary settings:
This being the case, it is the false prophets of peace who are being described in this passage. These prophets are denying God’s wrath and telling the people, “You shall not see the sword, nor shall you have famine, but I will give you assured peace in this place.” It is their bearing of this false message of peace that will prove to be these prophets’ undoing. As a result of their dishonest proclamation, they “shall be consumed” by “sword and famine.”
Several years ago … okay, many, many years ago … my parents gave me a unique keychain with a key to their car. I loved it! That key represented freedom and independence. Exactly what I was craving as a teenager. It was the right gift at the right time.
Overall = 4.5
Smith is far from reticent about dishing some dirt on people he’s worked with. One of the most surprising stories was his soured relationship with the Weinsteins. Though they started out as indie darlings, they’ve long since changed, and now a lot of their films are big-money productions. This was something I was already kind of familiar with — I love early Miramax films — but I had no idea about the stuff directly relating to Smith.
There is a lot to chew on here, too much to properly summarize, from grasping the nuances of life in the future solar system to parsing out the various speculations on the meaning of the mysterious monolith. Icehenge will hold the attention of the hard science fiction fan — particularly those who have already read and enjoyed Robinson’s Mars trilogy — until the final, puzzling revelations on Pluto.
I haven't edited the inside photos yet, so I hope to have that finished for tomorrows post.
Perhaps we live mainly in a ‘pure real’ world…
As my finacée, the one with other-world intelligence and advice on life more astute than anything I’ve ready before, would just say: Stop. Think. This constant consumption of our society — be it high-fructose corn syrup or your RSS feed — needs to just STOP and THINK sometimes. Or better yet, see the world and take in the information as something more than where the next drive-thru is.
Here are my Distress Inks that i've recently re-labelled. They were hand written before, but I downloaded Tim's list from the Ranger website and printed it on an A4 printer label - all I had to do then was trim it up. I have a thing about things being labelled properly and uniformly. I've yet to put them back in their colour groups and its bugging me to death. Do you think I might have a touch of OCD????
My Cloffice is being featured over at Remodelaholic today after 5pm CST! Justin and Cassity feature great remodeled spaces during the week on their blog. Go give them some blog love while you are there and look around, you won't be disappointed!
Thirdly, the guy was a doctor–which honestly freaked me out a lot and made me nervous before I went. Doctors and I never get along, never see eye-to-eye and it couldn’t even be said of us to have a bad relationship, because frankly we have no relationship. Not “real” doctors anyway. What makes a “real” doctor? Joder, do not get me started. All doctors are real doctors (even the homeopathic, acupuncturist kind). What separates the pack is the broadness and openness of the mind.
Primary purpose is to provide proactive and programmatic coverage of the SAP install base &
OK, maybe the best part may have been drinking the fine IPA at the Draught House and the Guinness Toast. Lee won’t argue because he was asleep on a pillar by the time the Guiness toast happened (and I'm sure his notes were in front of him). At least Nosegref, the Octopus Kid, Dancin’ Don, and the Crack were there to entertain me.
The big woman stood up and yelled, "You dare impugn the integrity of Madame Imelda, Chief Executive of the Extrasensory?! Take leave of my prescient presence at once, you worm!"
random cardstock
We thank him for this meal.
Georgetown University’s Department of Emergency Management & Operational Continuity (DEMOC) designed and led the exercise, which took place on Main Campus. As part of the exercise, students, faculty, and staff volunteers dispensed mock medications to participants to evaluate and practice response to a public health emergency. Volunteers from GERMS, CERT, and the Building & Floor Marshal Program participated in the exercise, with the Department of Public Safety (DPS) providing site security.
A upper class round turban.
On the trip to Anchorage, we flew through Burbank (this requires a little geography manipulating but the rewards are great), and encountered three West Coast springs. In Anchorage, six feet of rotten snow covered the garden. Here in Washington daffodils and cherries bloom, and tulips begin. But in Southern California the garden center parking lot held many cars and customers’ little wagons many plants.
Around me people hob and nob
...where do i begin?
You add it all up, and I may not dump fish in anyone's Porsche, but I am inclined to email Mr. LOC and say that I'm just not up right now for fitting into someone else's idea of a fun night, and that I hope he can find someone else to see the movie with him. But, in the same breath, I know that would feel kind of mean, so I can't do it, even though it would be genuine, just direct.
“Fine.” Arkam slouched and asked, “Any news?”
Experts have concluded for some time now that perhaps it will never be known exactly how and why such outwardly normal people could go so blindly and willingly into the sure certainty of their own destruction. As one expert explained:
And so we did, we went to Point Lonsdale and enjoyed the sunshine and walked along the beach (photos here).
In an attempt to develop political integration among the nation-states between the regions, here Latin America led by USA and Asia President Obama may consider the formation of a triangle among USA, India and China while USA constitutes the tip of the triangle and India and China constituting the two corners of the base of the triangle. With the growth and development of sub-regional nation-state in the two regions while the resources and the people (powerhouse and powerless- of the two categories the later stretches from the poor to the middle stratum) will be brought into single stream the anticipated triangle will be transformed into quadrant that includes Japan from Asia. The formation of triangle and quadrant is intended to develop certain model in development following the given World Embracing Alternate Paradigm In Development of Tarit Datta Gupta – Mary Kaldor which will come into discussions in the future blogs to post. In order to develop political integration with Europe, it will be very much useful to develop and improve relations with Russia though Russian President Mr. Vladimir Putin appears to think about ‘deep democracy’ as another metaphor of democracy. It is necessary for political integration to maintain more or less similar line of thoughts in development as much as possible, as such, as the Democratic Party of USA does not use metaphor rather talks about democracy which is ‘for, of and by’ the people and is applicable everywhere in demand-supply equation among the people, market and nation-state so Mr. Putin can also think to talk about democracy and highest form of democracy. It is intended to benefit the other nation-states of the globe from the uniqueness, charisma and magnetism in development that is awarded by the universally accepted definition of democracy. Similar structures with other regions and within the same region will also develop which necessitates drastic defense cut to avoid any sort of catastrophic competition among the sub-regional nation-states. The World Embracing Alternate Paradigm In Development Tarit Datta Gupta – Mary Kaldor hypothesis: Integrated Relations among Global Governance, Global Civil Society and Human Security Is Complete Life discusses in detail about the uninterrupted open highest form of capitalism with the supreme flavor and spirit of egalitarian and highest form of democracy.
New Orleans resident Kenlie Tiggeman is taking on the airlines controversial ‘Customers of Size’ policy which requires passengers to buy a second seat if they can’t fit between the 17-inch wide armrests.
What I’ve seen often (and I’ve certainly done this myself many times) is someone asking the Universe/God for what they want and then creating a long list of what they DON’T want. How many times have you done that? Essentially, what you’re doing when you do this is creating a push and pull dynamic between yourself and the Universe. You ask for something, and then you push it away. This doesn’t get you anywhere as you’ve already discovered.
so i quit my job.
18. Bake at 350 for about 35 minutes.
It cannot shut out memories.
To start with, I found pictures of myself from before all the weight gain. If you don’t have pictures of yourself the size you want to be, find pictures of models who you want to emulate. Do Not! put them on the refrigerator. This will only make you angry and law of attraction doesn’t work when you’re mad. Take these pictures of the way you want to look and carry them with you. At work, in restaurants, anywhere you’re tempted to eat wrong. When you start thinking you’ll have a donut instead of yogurt or, dessert instead of salad, take the picture out, look at it and then look down at your stomach, thighs, etc.
for some reason this quote really speaks to me. i have not read this book, nor do i intend to. from amazon, i learnt that the author was an orphan and her feelings stem from the abandonment she suffered during childhood as she was shunted from orphanage to various foster parents (i think).
Our two guides had preceded us into the room and had bowed deeply to the giant waxwork, like two people going into a Roman Catholic church and bowing to a crucifix of Jesus.
I've also included a scan of a Chia Pet matchbook that I've somehow managed to keep all these years. Came across it recently and decided it needed to be scanned. To tell you the truth, the matchbook is what kicked off my listening to the CD and deciding I should share the music.
But let’s stay out of the budgetary weeds, and remain on what is clear and straightforward.
For your help in answering, we'll send you a sale voucher of $10.00 off of your order (which will equal free shipping plus for almost all of you).
Combine first 8 ingredients in a large bowl; beat at low speed for 30 seconds. Beat at medium speed 2 minutes. Pour the batter into a 12 cup Bundt pan coated with cooking spray. Bake at 350 degrees for 50 minutes or until a wooden pick inserted in center comes out clean. Cool in pan for 10 minutes; remove from pan and cool completely.
5) Personal driver
Another wee blog absence has gone by...the last few weeks have been filled to the brim with 'important things to do' and weekends that disappear in a flash.
Disclaimer: DCWV has NOT, in any way, compensated me for mentioning their product. I just really happen to like DCWV paper stacks. They don't even know who I am, but I wouldn't mind if they did. ;)
I commit myself to becoming life as speaking and living words as me in self-honesty wherein my words as me in written and spoken form may emerge into and as a way that is supportive to/for and as all living beings and thus I commit myself to first breathing before I accept myself as inserting words unto this reality so that I may be assured that I am stopping myself from contributing any further suffering and/or abuse upon another and that I am in fact standing up for what’s Best for All.
Wrap the blank part of the wrapper around the bar, but do not tape it down, then wrap the other part AND attach it to the blank part of the wrapper. The reason you don't want to tape it to the foil part of the bar, is because then it is stuck and you can't shift it or straighten it out if you need to. This way it can slide around the bar if you need to adjust it.
But can this cacophonous cabal of scheming putschists smell the whiff of anger and draft of resentment being blown to our shores by furious northerly winds?
-Sheamus sidesteps Bryan in the corner.
Sparkle opened Sparkle Creations Rubber Stamps this year. Yes, she loves to craft, make cards, scrapbook, make notebooks and journals, paint, rubber stamping, and just aout anything else along those lines. She has been crafting for the last 12 years and is happy to have opened her own stamp company, Sparkle Creations Rubber Stamps.
Hubby said she was perfectly consistent...... broken back but wanted to go use crack.......pneumonia but wanted to go use crack or heroine with John. She gets a little money or other drugs to trade and John appears. He buys some beer for himself and gets her the drugs she wants. We decided to tell her she would have to spend her own money on the perscriptions.
prayer.
"When once a republic is corrupted, there is no possibility of remedying any of the growing evils but by removing the corruption and restoring its lost principles; every other correction is either useless or a new evil."With that in mind, we better take this next election very seriously.
Ghost 2: Well, this fool has a couple of dude’s with him, and they are standing around all serious with some sort of devices pointing around the room that are beeping for no reason, and then this guy starts yelling at me.
I remembered long nights in my twenties when a girl would say my name over and over again. L remembered the way boys had watched her and wanted her and did whatever they had to in order to have her. We saw ourselves as sleek beasts at one time, prowling jungle cats. But there was no reason to believe that we’d ever be sleek beasts again.
what will
The global destinations we visited were spectacular. Some see them as the reason for the journey. They were not. They were only the setting of a journey of prayer and devotion. I traveled a far greater distance in my heart and head, than over land or sea.
Alexander—dedicated surgeon and humanitarian—never expected an accident would end his time in the O.R. Nor did he expect to have to abandon his aid work. Now, back in Atlanta, he's faced with rebuilding his career…his life. And his hope for the future comes from the least likely source—the little family next door.
9:45 left in the 2nd quarter The new QB for UCLA screws it up and UH gets the ball back. UH's defense actually holds but an unsportsmanlike conduct screws it up. Anyway, UH is driving. Same score.
injection containing a “brown fluid”. This fluid was
but alas, again the voice whispered
So Mama, don't take my Kodachrome away"
with Old Overholt Rye, Carpano Antica, Cointreu, Crme de Cacao,
creatures descended
What do you say to someone who was once in your writers group, then lets you know in a hand written note that she found my book compelling, and took it with her everywhere she went until she finished it?
Make sure you stop by the Designers Blogs are some amazing inspiration - these ladies are inspirational on so many levels!! You can see the six new members of the Design Team making their debut this week....
I wasn’t very far from the secret street when I was welcomed officially to Amsterdam by the Grand-Master Designer of Everything.
One of the must-do things on your Singapore holiday is to take a ride on one of the very unique Singapore DUCKtour vehicles that move on both land and water. The DUCKtour vehicles are original war vehicles imported from Vietnam that were used during the Vietnam War.
So, let's start out with the layout...
Explore the meticulously restored manor’s 65 rooms with a local expert and following lunch enjoy a bike ride or stroll along the scenic lake shore with the family.
Change takes time. If it happens at all.
The title makes the concept reasonably obvious: in the opening scene, on New Year's Eve in what we can just about assume is 2006 (a Blood Diamond joke is made), San Franciscans Tom Solomon (Segel) proposes to Violet Barnes (Emily Blunt), one year to the day after they met. They plan on getting married fairly quickly, but she gets a terrific opportunity to do research at the University of Michigan, and they agree not to actually get married until they return to San Francisco and resume their previous lovely lives, which in Tom's case included being soux chef at one of the city's hot new restaurants. A two-year commitment turns into a four-year commitment, and by the time that one gets to wrapping up, the gauzy one-year glow of new romance has worn off, replaced by a stark reappraisal about what both halves of the couple expect both from their professional lives and their romantic partner. I will not tell you where this ends up taking them, though I don't suppose it is all that much of a surprise.
Having said that, I will move on to the second point which is: He commanded us to Love One Another. The love has been carefully defined for us: It is sacrificial, it secured in the cross, it was demonstrated by Jesus, it was commanded by Jesus, it is a demonstration of our obedience to Jesus, and it is the proper, lasting fruit that He has commissioned and enabled us to produce. Love matters. Might we say it this way: The measure of our maturity in Christ, the measure of our obedience to Christ, the measure of our love of Christ is demonstrated in our love for one another. Is that unreasonable? Do you think that we can just have any old feelings or any old sort of love for another that we choose? Or do you think that Jesus has defined this love for us?
"Why is it this guy on the street's business where I'm going?" people ask.
Cabbage, 3 leaves, cut into large pieces
I recently went to go see the Hunger Games movie. If you’ve been living under a rock, the Hunger Games is a young adult novel told in first person about a girl who, through circumstances, ends up on a televised reality-tv-ish gladiator death match (It’s much better than that. If you haven’t already read them, go now. You may have to wrestle a copy off a preteen because all the stores have sold out but it will be totally worth it). Because the books are told in first person, we’re only privy to the thoughts of our protagonist who, once trapped in the arena, can’t see what’s going on outside.
What’s more, Cuban officials meeting with the drug interdiction specialist referred to one of the hot-button issues between the countries: a mass exodus of Cubans like the Mariel boatlift in 1980 and the so-called “Balsero Crisis” of 1994.
Yo people, send me your big head shots, or you are gonna be looking at a whole lotta me and Rich and not much else. Now, while *I* am perfectly happy, egotistical person that I am, to plaster my mug all over the 'net, it might get boring for you, so send me some shit, ok? Get creative! Send 'em to me! The address is right over there on the right. And I promise to be better about checking that account. Really, I promise.
PB: There’s an old saying that “you can’t make a good deal with bad people.” I view a vote for a CSM as a contract between myself and the CSM. You are an admitted sadist, brag about slinging mud as a politician, and draw no distinction between you as a person and The Mittani. Regardless of how effective you say you were as a CSM last year, I feel its only a matter of time before you fall back on who you are as a person and politician. When this happens I think it’s safe to say that you’ll have no problem with screwing everyone over if you can… Eve, CCP, the players, and those who voted for you. I mean that’s what mud-slinging sadists do, right? I’m sure it’ll be lol-tastic too.
A. Yeah, he's ok. I'm safe with him. He's gay.
Emailed my last professor to tell her how much I enjoyed her class.
It does not have the fine tuning, as is evident in today's music but the elegance *sigh*, makes me put it in repeat mode whenever I listen to this tune.
Because marriage is, traditionally, performed in the church, it should be the church that decides whether or not a couple is allowed to marry in accordance with the particular church’s view. This means, to get back to Santorum, that he has no business giving a social critique or his personal opinion regarding the activities that take place in a gay couple’s bedroom. His comments regarding gays are therefore not only unnecessary but also detrimental to the image and message of the Republican party.
recovery.”
09 Born To Run (4:24)
Total number of named survivors, 325.
For me, this one is especially important. I am very serious about tracking my WW points. After a few beers, it gets really hard to remember how many I have had, and almost impossible to track them later! Some people say to limit your alcohol intake by drinking water in between beers, and that may work for some, but not for me! I'm not interested in filling up on water when I planned to drink beer all day!
I'll live my life to the fullest. I'll be happy. I'll brighten up. I will be more joyful than I have ever been. l will be kind to others. I will loosen up. I will tell others about Christ. i will go on adventures and change the world. I will be bold and not change who I really am. i will have no troubles but instead help others with their troubles.
